Trump's Super Tuesday


They call it Super Tuesday, but for everyone other than Hillary Clinton and Donald Trump, March 1 wasn’t a great night. The Democratic and Republican frontrunners racked up wins Tuesday, along with delegates, as each consolidated a lead.Could it have been a better night for either of them? Absolutely. As expected, Clinton lost Vermont to favorite son Bernie Sanders, but she also lost in Oklahoma, Colorado, and Minnesota. Trump was the big winner among the Republicans, but he lost states he was expected to win and saw his margin of victory slip below what polls had predicted in others.Even as the election results were rolling in, a debate raged over just how good a night it was for Trump. It’s undeniable—despite the protestations of anti-Trump pundits—that winning more states is better than winning fewer. As the clock struck midnight on the east coast, Trump could claim victories in Georgia, Alabama, Massachusetts, Tennessee, Virginia, and Arkansas. He even squeezed out a win in Vermont, where John Kasich came in a close second. Proportional-allocation rules for delegates, however, mean that although Trump will win the most delegates, his rivals will also take quite a few. According to New York Times projections, Trump was likely to take more than 200 delegates, trailed by Ted Cruz and Marco Rubio. That would give Trump more than 400 delegates, but he’s still a long way short of the 1,237 needed to lock up the nomination. The problem for the other candidates, and for the many Republicans who find Trump unacceptable, is that none of his rivals is close to him.It was a pretty good night for Cruz, who won his home state of Texas and scored a victory in the neighboring state of Oklahoma, too. Or at least it was a good night, scored against the expectations Tuesday morning. It wasn’t that long ago, however, that Cruz’s advocates were touting the many contests in Southern states—the “SEC Primary”—as his firewall, where he would clean up in states heavy on evangelical voters. Judged against those expectations, it was a disappointing evening for the Cruz team. Looking ahead, he faces a stretch of states that aren’t likely to be as friendly to him. Still, Cruz used his remarks in suburban Houston to paint himself as the only hope for stopping Trump.“God bless the Lone Star State. And God bless the great state of Oklahoma,” Cruz said. “So long as the field remains divided, Donald Trump’s path to the nomination remains more likely, and that would be a disaster for Republicans, for conservatives, and for the nation. After tonight, we have seen that our campaign is the only campaign that has beaten, that can beat, and that will beat Donald Trump.”Without naming Rubio or John Kasich directly, Cruz called on both of them to leave the race. “The candidates who have not yet won a state, who have not yet won significant delegates, I ask you to prayerfully considered coming together, united,” he said.As those comments suggested, things were bleaker for Rubio, who had a roller-coaster evening. Early in the night, analysis—or was it wishful thinking?—suggested Rubio might be able to win in Virginia, a state with a high concentration of well-educated, wealthier, establishment-friendly Republicans in Northern Virginia. In the end, though, Rubio couldn’t pull out the win there. The Florida senator finally notched a win in Minnesota late Tuesday—his first victory of the campaign. But in several states, Rubio was in danger of failing to cross the 20-percent threshold the party imposes to win any of the statewide delegates allocated on a proportional basis.Yet when Rubio came out to speak, early in the night, he once again struck the same triumphant pose he has employed time and again, as his campaign finished second or third in contest after contest. “When I am president of the United States, we will not just save the American dream, we will expand it to more people than ever!” he said.The most telling moment in his speech, however, came a few moments later. "Five days ago, we began to explain to the American people that Donald Trump is a con artist," Rubio said, alluding to the onslaught of opposition research, insults, and barnyard jokes he has directed at the GOP frontrunner, starting with Thursday’s debate. Why did that take so long, though? It may have been too late to save the Republican Party from Trump, and if it wasn’t, it may have been too late to save Rubio. His case as the Trump alternative depends not on beating Trump outright, but on depriving him of an outright victory with delegates ahead of the Republican convention, then wresting the nomination from him there. Rubio’s moment of truth comes on March 15, when Florida votes. If he can’t win the Sunshine State, his campaign is likely over.Trump leads in polls there so far, and he taunted Rubio by holding his election-night celebration at his Mar-a-Lago resort in Palm Beach. Backed by a meek Chris Christie, Trump boasted, joked, meandered, argued, and cajoled, taking questions from reporters and taking shots at Rubio. While Trump could have won more states, and he could have won by larger margins, the victories for both Rubio and Cruz mean neither man seems likely to leave the race. So far, division among Republicans has served Trump well.Sanders called it an early night, capitalizing on his victory in Vermont. He gave a speech that almost sounded like a requiem for his impressive run. “This campaign is not just about electing a president; it is about transforming America,” he said. “It is about making our great country the nation that we know it has the potential to be. It is about dealing with some unpleasant truths that exist in America today and having he guts to confront those truths.”Yet Sanders aides promised to fight on to the convention, and later results showed that he had won several states. In addition to Oklahoma, Sanders won in Colorado and in Minnesota—a state he’d campaigned in heavily, as he did in the Sooner State. But he lost to Clinton in Massachusetts, another state where he’d concentrated his energies.Clinton, meanwhile, didn’t quite pull off the clean sweep of non-Vermont states that she’d hoped for, but she scored wins across the South, including in Georgia, Virginia, Alabama, Tennessee, and Texas. She is projected to take roughly double Sanders’s delegate total. Clinton has turned her attentions to the general election and to Donald Trump.“[Our] work is not to make America great again. America never stopped being great. We have to make America whole,” Clinton said. “I believe what we need in America today is more love and kindness.” She delivered some fiery lines as well. "If you cheat your employees, exploit consumers, pollute our environment, or rip off the taxpayers we are going to hold you accountable.”The story of the night remains the Republican side, though, and Trump’s strong showing. As the dust clears Wednesday, there will be renewed calls for both John Kasich and Ben Carson to leave the race. Kasich insists he has no plans to go anywhere until at least the March 15 elections, when he promises to win Ohio and hopes Rubio loses Florida. Pressure on Kasich and Carson to bow out is nothing new. Rubio, however, will have to work hard to prove that he’s still a viable candidate after a not-so-super Tuesday.—David GrahamIn an interview with CNN, Ted Cruz calls tonight's results "a winnowing process," but even strong prompting from Wolf Blitzer can't get him to name Marco Rubio in particular—or, for that matter, Kasich or Carson. He remained laser-focused on Trump. "I am the only candidate who has beaten Donald three times," he said. "The path to beating him is for us to unify.”In an interview with Jake Tapper on CNN, Marco Rubio claimed that he wasn't worried about Donald Trump's overwhelming success tonight. Why? Because, Rubio said, the Republican establishment simply won't be throwing its weight behind a candidate as unworthy as Trump. But actually, Ronald Brownstein recently wrote, it might be time for conservatives to recognize Trump as the successful, complex candidate he is: “If Trump can beat Cruz [on Super Tuesday] in heavily blue-collar and evangelical states on one side, and top Kasich and Rubio in white collar, less culturally conservative states on the other, it will grow increasingly daunting for any candidate to coalesce a coalition large enough to stop the front-runner.”CNN has now called the Minnesota caucuses for Bernie Sanders, giving him his fourth win of the night. Clinton has won the other seven, mostly larger states.Rubio's win in Minnesota is a rare bright spot for him, but he's still facing a rough road in the overall delegate hunt. The Florida senator is still below the 20-percent threshold in three states: Alabama with 18 percent of the vote, Massachusetts with 18 percent, and Texas with 17 percent. He's also dangerously close to it in Tennessee with 21 percent and Vermont with 20 percent.Clinton's win in Massachusetts could be predictive, ​The Wall Street Journal reported earlier today, citing how "closely watched" the state's race has been. "The outcome in the solidly Democratic state could foreshadow the direction of a party that has been divided between Mr. Sanders’s idealism and Mrs. Clinton’s pragmatism.” One state this victory could foreshadow if Sanders stays in the race till April? Maryland, which has a similar number of Democratic delegates and is similarly true blue.Marco Rubio is projected to win Minnesota—his first win in the presidential primary race thus far. The Florida senator sent out a press release to reporters earlier in the evening dubbing the campaign the “underdogs” in the race and seemingly putting the onus on Florida to keep him in the race. “Florida, I know you’re ready. The pundits say we’re underdogs, I’ll accept that. We’ve all been underdogs. This is a community of underdogs. This is a state of underdogs. This is a country of underdogs. But we will win,” Rubio said in the statement.As Elaine noted, Minnesota could save Rubio from a shutout, and the North Star State's demographics might be just the mix he needed. It's highly educated, and the majority of its voters live in the urban and suburban area surrounding Minneapolis, where Rubio is leading Cruz by a decent margin. The Florida senator also picked up a boatload of state-level endorsements."Tonight we basically fought Donald Trump to a draw,” said Marco Rubio, in an interview with Jake Tapper on CNN. Tapper asks him if he's in denial.I just checked the transcript of Marco Rubio's speech to supporters in Miami tonight, and the senator, who has not won a state tonight, said "When I am president..." 10 times. Rubio's on CNN right now talking to Jake Tapper, saying that he's "prepared all along for an extended haul." "We have more support than ever before," he said.How much is Trump's rise convulsing the GOP? Here's South Carolina Senator Lindsey Graham last week at the Washington Press Club Foundation dinner:And here's Graham tonight after Trump's dominant performance:Bernie Sanders has won his third state of the night, as MSNBC declares him the winner of the caucuses in Colorado. He won Oklahoma and his home state of Vermont earlier in the evening, and he is currently leading in Minnesota among the early returns from the caucuses there.Television news tonight has been filled with pillars of the Republican establishment who are positively aghast at the looming nomination of Donald Trump. On MSNBC, former House Majority Leader Tom DeLay told Chris Matthews that the party could simply deny Trump the nomination at the convention if delegates broke away from him, even if he was the clear choice of a majority of voters in the primaries. On CBS, Senator Lindsey Graham said Republicans were "about to lose to the most dishonest politician in America, Hillary Clinton." He said several times and without equivocation that Republicans would simply lose if Trump won the nomination, because, he said, "dishonest beats crazy."Marco Rubio might just score his first victory of the campaign in Minnesota, where he is currently leading Ted Cruz 37.3 to 28 percent, with 79 percent of poll results in.In rattling off a list of Trump's ​boo​-inducing policies, Cruz alleged that Trump "funded the Gang of Eight," referring to the team of senators—including rival Marco Rubio—who collaborated on a failed 2013 immigration reform bill. By contrast, Cruz "led the successful opposition" to their "amnesty plan." The history of Cruz's opposition to the bill is muddled; FactCheck.org has a nice rundown of why.But what was noticeably missing from Cruz's speech tonight was an argument once central to proving his immigration bona fides: that Alabama Senator Jeff Sessions, an immigration hard-liner, has defended Cruz's opposition to the bill. Cruz can't invoke Sessions anymore because his fellow senator recently announced he's endorsing Trump. In a statement released by the Trump campaign Sunday, Sessions said that “Trump’s trade and immigration plans will revitalize our shrinking middle class, keeping jobs and wealth and income inside the United States of America. Trump understands that a nation must always place the interests of its own people first.”Tonight, Donald Trump railed against Marco Rubio in his speech, pinning him as a loser who hasn’t won any states yet. And Cruz went after Trump, reiterating that his campaign is the only one that’s beaten the Republican front-runner. The candidates that haven’t received a mention? John Kasich and Ben Carson. According to Todd Starnes, Carson has reiterated that he’s not dropping out of the race, which is in line with what the neurosurgeon’s advisor said earlier today—that Carson won’t drop out until a candidate reaches the delegate count for the nomination."Five years ago, I promised the people of Texas that I would fight with every breath in my body to stop Obamacare," Cruz says. According to the EPA, the average person takes between 17,280 and 23,040 breaths a day.  Let's say it takes President Cruz his first 100 days in office to begin to follow through on that—that's between 1.7 million and 2.3 million breaths!Trump and Cruz both want to unify the GOP, but for two very different reasons. "I am a unifier," Trump said in his speech earlier. "I would love to see the Republican party and everybody get together." Cruz called for a unified party, too. "That is the only way to beat Donald Trump," he said.“American shouldn't have a president whose words would make you feel embarrassed if you repeated them," Cruz says in a knock against Trump, after quoting JFK and FDR.Cruz asks the Republicans who have not won states or significant delegates to "prayerfully consider" coming together—i.e. dropping out of the race and supporting him. The trouble with this request is that as Trump has pointed out, Cruz is the most disliked Republican in the field among party leaders and the other candidates.Speaking in his home state of Texas after winning its primary by a sizable margin, Senator Ted Cruz declares that “so long as the field remains divided, Donald Trump’s path to the nomination remains more likely. And that would be a disaster for Republicans, conservatives, and the nation.” He calls his campaign the only one that "can beat, has beat, and will beat Donald Trump.”Many candidates are finding reason to cheer tonight. Trump and Clinton are racking up the wins. Ted Cruz pulled out two victors, as did Bernie Sanders. But I want to take a moment to salute a candidate who’s often been overlooked this year: former Virginia Governor Jim Gilmore.For months, pundits wondered how to tell whether Gilmore was actually running. He was squeezed out of most debates, and hardly traveled or campaigned. He was beloved by reporters for his eagerness to answer any question; he told my colleague Nora Kelly that Hillary Clinton is just as much of a socialist as Bernie Sanders. And then, just like that, he dropped out of the race.But tonight, Jim Gilmore finally received the recognition he so craved. In Chelsea, Massachusetts, 366 voters cast their ballots for Gilmore, according to the Boston Globe’s tally, which would give him 47 percent of the vote—and, so far as I know, his first recorded win in any jurisdiction.The key to winning, it seems, was dropping out entirely. Maybe Gilmore knew what he was doing all along.Update: Although the official returns clearly show Gilmore in the lead, Jeff Blehar of Decision Desk HQ suggests that they’re likely one row off—which would make Chelsea’s results more in line with those of surrounding jurisdictions. If so, Gilmore has once again been left out in the cold.Asked whether or not he trusts the Republican National Committee, Trump plays nice, mostly. “I like the RNC. I don't know that I've been treated fairly or not. I can't tell you that.” But he’s confident that, after tonight’s showing, the party would be crazy to turn him down. "If I'm going to win all of those states with tremendous numbers … I think it's awfully hard to say that's not the person we want to lead the party."Trump hit Rubio for not winning any states tonight, but Rubio is also dangerously close to falling below the 20 percent viability thresholds in a number of races. He's at 17 percent in Alabama, 18 percent in Massachusetts, 19 percent in Texas, and 19 percent in Vermont. Even in Georgia and Tennessee, he's hovering just slightly above the threshold, at 22 and 20 percent respectively. There are a lot of votes still to be counted tonight, but it's going to be a nailbiter for the Rubio campaign as the race pivots into a delegate slugfest.Trump on his relations with Congress, where Republican leaders have distanced themselves from his rhetoric: "Paul Ryan, I don't know him, but I'm going to get along great with him. And if I don't, he's going to have to pay a big price, okay?"Donald Trump is asked about David Duke, the former Grand Wizard of the Knights of the Ku Klux Klan who recently endorsed the candidate. As Yoni reported on Sunday, back in 2000, Trump roundly condemned Duke. But in an interview with Jake Tapper this past Sunday, Trump dodged a question about whether he would repudiate support from Duke and white-supremacist groups. "I mean, I don’t know what group you’re talking about. You wouldn’t want me to condemn a group that I know nothing about," he said in the interview. Tonight, he gave a somewhat more straightforward answer. "I said I disavow," he said. "How many times do I have to disavow?"For the last week, an energized Marco Rubio has tormented Donald Trump—sending a steady stream of playground taunts in his direction. His supporters cheered his new combativeness, delighted that someone was finally sticking it to The Donald.But looking at the map tonight, it’s hard to see how it helped him. He hasn’t won any more states than Jeb Bush, who also tangled with Trump, to no apparent electoral advantage. Ted Cruz, meanwhile, has maintained a laser-like focus on his core voters—fighting to retain church-going southern evangelicals, by pointing out all the ways in which Trump’s views differ from their own. That effort appears to have paid off for Cruz in Oklahoma and Texas, even without his mocking the size of Trump’s hands, or any other part of his anatomy.But Cruz lost the other Southern states up for grabs tonight, which he’d long counted on winning. He hasn’t demonstrated the ability to expand beyond his base of support. Even with the lion’s share of Texas’s huge trove of delegates, he trails far behind Trump—and doesn’t appear to have a shot of taking Florida, Ohio, or the other winner-take-all contests coming up on the calendar. That leaves him in the same spot as Rubio—with little prospect of actually winning, just hoping to deny Trump an outright majority of the delegates.With Chris Christie standing behind him, Donald Trump delivered a victory speech from Palm Beach, Florida, calling the night "an amazing evening." Trump quickly launched into an attack on Hillary Clinton, a reminder that the frontrunners on both sides of the aisle are increasingly looking toward the general election and anticipating an intense fight. "She wants to make America whole again, and I'm trying to figure out what is that all about," Trump said reacting to Clinton's speech earlier in the night.Trump pit his promises against Clinton's, setting up a battle of the slogans. "Make America Great Again is gonna be much better than making America whole again," he promised. Trump congratulated Ted Cruz on winning Texas, but didn't offer much praise for Marco Rubio. "He had a tough night," Trump said of his Republican rival. "He is a lightweight as I've said many times before.”"I don't know that she's going to be allowed to run," Trump says of Hillary Clinton, continuing his strategy of questioning the very legitimacy of his opponents, beginning with President Obama. Does he really think she'll be sitting in jail come the fall?Donald Trump declares: “We have expanded the Republican Party.” Is that true? As yet, I’d say it’s unclear. He seems to have brought in new voters. But how many existing voters will flee the GOP if he’s the nominee?Trump is asked about threats from conservatives like Senator Ben Sasse about the possibility of supporting a third-party candidate instead of Trump. "They can always do that, and then they'll just lose everything," he replies.Listening to Donald Trump’s promise to campaign hard in Florida, I’m struck by this thought: Ted Cruz won his home state tonight––and Marco Rubio could still lose his. That reality ought to factor into the intra-Republican debate about whether Senator Cruz or Senator Rubio is the better Trump-stopper.A day ago, Chris Christie refused to take any "off-topic" questions at a press conference where reporters wanted to know exactly why, after months of bashing Donald Trump, Christie had suddenly endorsed him for president. Now, Christie is in Palm Beach, Florida, introducing Trump's speech to supporters. "He has shown himself to be tough and strong and bold. He's shown himself to be a fighter," Christie said. "A leader who speaks plainly to the American people. He has listened to the American people. The American people are listening to him. And he's bringing the country together. That, ladies and gentlemen, is not a campaign. It's a movement."Jake Tapper just called Ted Cruz's win in Oklahoma "huge," arguing that Cruz now has enough ammunition to argue convincingly that he, not Rubio, is the viable alternative to Trump. But Aaron Blake at The Washington Post says Cruz's success in Oklahoma may actually indicate weakness: It's possible he's just a regional pick. While Cruz has heavily courted the evangelical Christian vote, his efforts haven't amounted to much in the South, which has favored Trump. "Thus far, evangelicals in other parts of the country just aren't giving him the support he needs," Blake writes.Chris Christie speaking from Palm Beach: "Tonight, Donald Trump is the clear winner on Super Tuesday, but the win is important for our country. Tonight Donald Trump has won Georgia and Massachusetts, Alabama and Virginia, and he's also won the great state of Tennessee. Tonight is the beginning of Donald Trump bringing the Republican party together for a big victory this November." And tonight is the beginning of him bringing the nation together, too, Christie adds.If you're surprised that Bernie has taken my home state of Oklahoma, don't be. In the last twenty years the state has changed from blue to red. (As recently as 2008, the state senate was split evenly.) If you've resisted that trend and are still a Democrat in Oklahoma, you're likely a diehard liberal. I once described to a Californian that being a liberal in Oklahoma is like a secret handshake, what being a dedicated conservative must feel like in California. Oklahoma Bernie supporters even created their own brand of salsa, Feel the Bern.We're still waiting for results from Minnesota, Alaska, and most of Arkansas, but it's worth taking a step back and looking at just how disappointing the results are so far for Marco Rubio, who has become the GOP establishment's choice to take on Donald Trump. He's lost the entire South to Trump as well as Texas and Oklahoma to Cruz. And it looks like he'll pick up more third-place finishes than second. He fared the best in Virginia, where he finished a few points behind Trump. But that was due almost entirely to his dominance in the Northern Virginia precincts just outside Washington D.C., where as Yoni noted, the Republican establishment literally lives. Put another way: Rubio won the Beltway, and only the Beltway. And that will be a powerful argument that Cruz can make for why he is the more viable candidate to take on Trump in the weeks ahead.Fox is reporting that Florida Governor Rick Scott will endorse Donald Trump tonight—a report that his spokeswoman quickly shot down. If such an endorsement does materialize, though, it’d be pretty amazing. First, it’d be amazing if a two-term Republican governor were to back Trump for president. But it’s also striking that Trump would want Scott’s backing. Just a few years ago, Scott had plummeted to a stunningly low 26 percent approval rating. But then Scott rebounded and won reelection, and he has since compared himself to Trump, praising him in an op-ed for "capturing the frustration of many Americans after seven years of President Obama’s very intentional government takeover of the U.S. economy.” Both men share a history in business—and controversial business records, too.On the Democratic front, 65 percent of Latino voters backed Hillary Clinton in Texas in comparison to Bernie Sanders’s 34 percent. Texas has one of the “largest Hispanic statewide eligible voter shares” in the country, according to the Pew Research Center.  The exit polls in the state tonight are far more clear than they were following the Nevada Democratic caucuses. Then, the polls were a point of contention between the two candidates after they showed the Vermont senator with a lead among Latinos. Sanders has struggled to gain traction with minority voters, and tonight’s results reflect that.Vermont isn't among the highest-profile Republican races tonight, but Trump and Kasich are in a tight duel for the victory there nonetheless. With 43 percent of the vote in, the New York billionaire leads the Ohio governor 33 percent to 30 percent. Trailing in third place, once again, is Marco Rubio. With 19.3 percent of the vote, he's currently slated to fall below the 20 percent viability threshold in the state, so he’d claim none of its 16 delegates.After winning his home state of Vermont earlier in the evening, Bernie Sanders has now won Oklahoma. It might not seem like a natural fit for the self-described Democratic socialist candidate, but the Sanders campaign had been hoping he would pull out a victory in the state. “Oklahoma is a place where there is a tremendous amount of outsider, anti-establishment sentiment in the electorate,” Sanders's top strategist Tad Devine told USA Today, explaining the campaign's rationale. Expect Team Sanders to point to the victory in Oklahoma as evidence of broad appeal.One question coming into tonight was who Latino voters would back in the Republican race. In the Nevada Republican caucuses, Donald Trump had a commanding lead, leaving Ted Cruz and Marco Rubio trailing behind. In Texas, though, it looks as though Cruz has come out ahead. According to CNN’s exit polls, 31 percent of Latinos backed Cruz, followed by 28 percent for Trump and 27 percent for Rubio. Latinos made up 10 percent of the state’s GOP primary voters.Rubio's tough night is underscored by how few people will see him: He began his Election Night speech while Hillary Clinton was still speaking, and after showing him for a few minutes, all three cable news channels cut away before he was done.Right now, Marco Rubio is running at around 19 percent statewide in Texas. If he fails to break 20 percent, he won’t get any of the state’s 44 at-large delegates; if he does, he might grab a few from Trump and Cruz. As Anderson Cooper just said on CNN, "He’s not only running against Trump and Cruz. He’s running against math."The bulk of the Republican winner-take-all contests are still on the horizon, and they’ll keep this thing nominally competitive for some time at least. There are 391 winner-take-all delegates left, including those in Florida, Ohio, and Arizona. These contests represent a third of all remaining delegates. For Rubio, Florida still represents a long-shot chance to close the gap on March 15. It is, as my colleague Nora notes, the location of several campaign speeches.However, the Kansas, Kentucky, Louisiana, Michigan, and Mississippi primaries between now and then might dilute that long shot even more.A burst of good news for Cruz tonight. Not only has he won Texas, but he's taken Oklahoma as well. Up until just minutes ago, the race in Oklahoma was too close to call.Ted Cruz really needed a win in Texas, and it looks like he got it with several networks calling the state for the Lone Star State senator. Earlier in the day, Cruz candidly told reporters in Houston that "any candidate who cannot win his home state has real problems." If the senator had lost Texas, it would have been hard for Cruz's campaign to argue that he had a viable path forward to win the GOP nomination. Now, Cruz can point to his Texas win as evidence that he deserves to stay in the race.Speaking as a Californian, and with no offense intended toward folks in sparsely populated Alaska and Nevada, I’d love to see future election cycles that incorporated more West Coast voters and their sensibilities earlier in the primary process. Texas has a culture all its own, and I’m glad it votes on Super Tuesday. But if I had my druthers, California or Colorado would move up its primary and do more to shape races on both sides of the partisan divide.Both Fox and NBC are calling Texas for Cruz. It's a must-win victory for the senator as his campaign noted over the past few days. But since the state allocates delegates proportionally, Rubio's third-place performance may actually be crucial here. He's currently sitting at 19.5 percent of the vote with 33 percent of precincts reporting. If he doesn't break the 20 percent threshold, he doesn't get any delegates from the state—and Cruz and Trump get even more.As expected, Texas is called for Hillary Clinton as soon as the polls closed at 9 p.m. EasternClinton is speaking tonight from Florida—Miami, specifically—which isn't voting until March 15. Her choice of location could be interpreted as a signal of her confidence in Tuesday's results, that she's already moving on to the next big contests. Her Republican counterpart, Donald Trump, is similarly in the Sunshine State, celebrating at his Mar-a-Lago property in Palm Beach.Hillary Clinton declares to cheering supporters: “What a Super Tuesday!” She has won five states: Alabama, Arkansas, Georgia, Tennessee, and Virginia. This is Clinton country dating back to the 1990s, when Bill Clinton rose from the Arkansas governor’s mansion to the presidency. “This country belongs to all of us, not just those at the top,” Clinton says. “America prospers when we all prosper. America is strong when we’re all strong.” Taking a shot at Donald Trump, she declares that the work before us is not “to make America great again,” because “America never stopped being great.” The crowd chants, “USA, USA, USA.”Clinton victorious, from Florida: "I congratulate Senator Sanders for his strong showing and campaigning." She thanks her supporters, surrogates, and online donors—"most" of whom, she notes, gave "less than $100." It's an obvious nod to Sanders' small-dollar donor base.Donald Trump is now projected to win Virginia. John Kasich raked in more than 66,000 votes in Virginia—if they’d gone to Rubio, they would’ve given him the state. With two Republican establishment figures in the mix, it’s been particularly difficult for support to coalesce behind one candidate—one reason for Rubio’s defeat. Meanwhile, Kasich is looking to upcoming races in the Midwest to keep his campaign afloat. Tonight’s results may increase the pressure on Kasich to exit the race.Georgia has already been called for Trump, who’s piled up 45 percent of the vote with 12 percent of the precincts reporting. But more could develop tonight: If he gets more the 50 percent of the vote statewide, he automatically gets all of the state's 76 delegates. It's similar to how the votes fell in South Carolina, where Trump won every delegate by leading in every congressional district. But this time, it could be easier; Georgia delegate rules would award every delegate to Trump, even at the congressional district level, if he gets a majority across the state.Clinton has to be breathing a not-entirely-unexpected sigh of relief that she has won her adopted home state of Arkansas, where her husband served as governor for two terms. At a campaign stop in Pine Bluff last week, she told voters that “Arkansas runs deep in me.” She said at the time that she was “so grateful and so proud to have Arkansas connections, and I will do whatever I can as president to be a good partner to this state.”The votes are being counted, but in a race this closely contested, it’s likely to be the delegate count that ultimately matters.The crew at the New York Times’ Upshot blog—Amanda Cox, Josh Katz, and Kevin Quealy—has built a real-time estimator of the total hauls for each candidate that bounces back and forth as the results come in. At the moment, it shows Trump hovering around 290 for the night, Cruz at around 145, Rubio at 95, Kasich at 25, and Carson at 15. (By the time you visit the site, those numbers will have changed again.) There’s still room for some substantial shifts. But those results would put Trump about a third of the way toward the 1,237 he’ll need to secured the Republican nomination.Needless to say, any victories for Ted Cruz beyond Texas tonight would be big for him, given that many had been close to writing off his campaign given Rubio's strong finish in South Carolina. He now has a shot at Arkansas and Oklahoma, according to the early returns and projections.Exit polls are showing Donald Trump with a commanding lead in some Southern states, which Ted Cruz was also banking on for its swath of evangelical voters. In Alabama, 45 percent of evangelical voters back Trump, with Cruz trailing behind at 19 percent, according to exit polls. But in Oklahoma, Cruz takes the lead at 37 percent. How this plays out tonight could sway the race. As my colleague Ronald Brownstein has noted, Trump’s broad appeal could “grow increasingly daunting for any candidate to coalesce a coalition large enough to stop the front-runner.”One name you’re not seeing much on the network big boards is Ben Carson’s. He has won only a handle of delegates to date, and his Super Tuesday pickings appear slim: He hasn’t pulled more than 6 percent of the vote in any state currently reporting returns. Accordingly, he’s not getting a lot of airtime. (Fellow long-shot John Kasich, on the other hand, was name-checked earlier by anchors about a possible stronger-than-expected showing in Massachusetts, and he had an early bump in Vermont.)But the retired neurosurgeon has talked a strong game, and aides say he’s “galvanized about staying in.” No word yet on if he’ll return to Florida for a breather, a habit of his after losses.Exit polls in Oklahoma show Cruz with 32 percent of the vote, followed by Rubio and Trump tied with 27 percent. If you're hoping GOP voters will defeat Trump once they unite behind a single candidate, this isn't a good sign for consolidation any time soon. Cruz pinned his hopes on winning his home state of Texas, where polls haven’t closed yet. If he pulls off a victory there as well as one in Oklahoma, he could make a strong case to keep going in hopes of becoming the eventual anti-Trump candidate.Coming into Super Tuesday, Hillary Clinton was expected to ride a wave of support among black voters who helped her secure a victory in the South Carolina Democratic primary. That appears to be the case tonight. In Virginia, 82 percent of African American voters backed Clinton in comparison with Bernie Sanders’s 18 percent, according to exit polls. In Georgia, Clinton won 83 percent. The former secretary of state has been projected the winner of both states. And in Tennessee, where Clinton has also been projected the winner, she secured 82 percent support among black voter compared with Sanders’s 12 percent.ABC News reports Hillary Clinton has overwhelmingly won American Samoa, the U.S. territory in the South Pacific where 11 delegates are at stake for the Democrats. (Republicans will compete for its nine delegates at a later contest, on March 22.) Clinton won 73 percent to Bernie Sanders’s 27 percent. Earlier today, Clinton called into the territory’s sole caucus site to ask voters for their support. Clinton won there in 2008, pulling 57 percent to Barack Obama’s 42 percent. Because of its territory status, American Samoa won’t participate in the general, but registered Democrats and Republicans can vote in the nominating contests.As the polls close in four states at 8 p.m., MSNBC calls Massachusetts for Donald Trump, says it’s “too early to call” between Clinton and SandersMSNBC calls Alabama and Tennessee for Trump and Clinton.The dust hasn’t yet settled on the results of Super Tuesday, but Bernie Sanders seems ready to call it a night. Not long after media outlets declared a victory for Sanders in his home state of Vermont, the Democratic presidential candidate gave a speech proclaiming that he plans to fight on in the presidential primary race, even if he faces long odds. Sanders reminded voters that, at the end of the night, many states will not yet have picked winners in the Democratic primary, promising that his campaign will “take our fight for economic justice, for social justice, for environmental sanity, for a world of peace, to every one of those states.”Sanders’s speech was timed strategically, allowing the senator to revel in his Vermont victory before results from other states where he likely faces defeat trickle in. “You know we want to win in every part of the country, that goes without saying,” Sanders said. “But it does say something and means so much to me that the people who know me best … have voted so strongly to put us in the White House.”Of course, winning isn’t everything. “What I have said,” the Vermont senator yelled out, “is that this campaign is not just about electing a president, it is about making a political revolution.” Sanders stressed that his political revolution is about unity, warning that we must “not allow the Donald Trumps of the world to divide us.” Reminding his followers what’s at stake, Sanders hit on familiar themes, promising to fight against the billionaire class, and tackle economic inequality. His promises were met with enthusiastic applause. For now, Sanders will keep on fighting.According to ABC’s early exit polls results, about four in 10 GOP primary voters in Georgia, Virginia, and Texas support deporting undocumented immigrants versus offering a route to legal status. Republican presidential candidates have sparred over the issue of immigration on the debate stage but have come short of mentioning what they would do to fix it. As ABC notes, these results may be a good sign for Marco Rubio in Virginia. Rubio has been particularly vulnerable on the issue since waffling on his support of immigration reform in 2013. Donald Trump’s position on immigration has fueled his surge. In addition to building a wall, he’s also called for the deportation of undocumented immigrants.Virginia exit polls underscore that voters who view health care as the most important issue are breaking strongly toward Clinton. Is Sanders’s plan connecting at all in the states that need additional health-care reform the most?The five remaining Republican candidates have been emphatic in their disdain for Washington insiders. But how do Washington insiders feel about them?The GOP in the District of Columbia won’t meet until March 12. But no matter. Most of the city’s Republican elite lives across the Potomac in northern Virginia, anyway. A decade ago, during the Bush administration, The New Republic proclaimed that the suburban mansions of McLean had displaced the salons of Georgetown as the “new home of America’s ruling class.”Exit polls tonight show Ted Cruz drawing an anemic 13 percent support in the D.C. suburbs, and Trump just 18 percent. They trail John Kasich, who piles up an impressive 24 percent. And at the top of the heap is the favored candidate of the conservative establishment, Marco Rubio, polling an impressive 40 percent.The problem for Rubio is the same one he faces across the map: not enough white-collar professionals to lock up the race. The same exit poll shows him a few points behind Trump statewide. In western and central Virginia, where Trump amasses 44 percent of the vote, Kasich barely registers at 4 percent.Results like these help explain one of Washington’s great riddles: Why didn’t the GOP’s leadership see this coming? Why didn’t it do more to stop Trump? The answer, it seems, is that if the nation looked like their neighborhoods, Rubio and Kasich would be battling it out, with Trump a distant afterthought. In McLean, everything looked just the way they expected. But the rest of America doesn’t look like McLean.In a story published this morning, my colleague Clare reported on Sanders’s substantial fundraising operation, writing how the “campaign has worked hard to translate voter enthusiasm and anger into donations, and Sanders has seized on opportune moments to make appeals.” Tonight, the campaign saw such an opportune moment when the networks called Vermont for the senator. In a fundraising email sent just minutes after the polls closed and the state’s race was called,  Sanders asked voters for a small donation, $2.70, writing how the campaign has snagged its “first victory of the night.” The margin “should be impressive as well,” which means “a lot of delegates” for the campaign. “I think we are going to do quite well tonight.”In former presidential candidate news: Six New Jersey newspapers have published identical editorials calling for Chris Christie to resign as governor. They criticized Christie’s recent endorsement of Donald Trump, a rival he spent months trash-talking before dropping out of the race last month after a poor showing in New Hampshire. The editorial boards don’t mince words: “What an embarrassment. What an utter disgrace,” they wrote. “We’re fed up with Gov. Chris Christie’s arrogance.”Greetings from Mar-a-Lago, Trump’s golf estate in Palm Beach, Florida, where he is scheduled to address the media at 9 p.m. Reporters are crammed into a small, ornate, gilt-bedecked ballroom, and the sun has set on the palm trees and manicured grounds outside. Here’s a picture:CNN’s exit poll has Trump at 40 percent in Georgia, followed by Cruz at 24 percent and Rubio at 23 percent. That looks like a resounding victory, but Georgia’s delegates are awarded proportionally. If both Cruz and Rubio creep above the 20 percent threshold when votes come in, both candidates could cut into Trump’s delegate haul from the state.Don’t expect any kind of concession from Bernie Sanders tonight no matter how well Clinton does. Appearing on CNN, Sanders campaign manager Jeff Weaver says the Vermont senator is “going all the way to the convention.” Campaigns routinely say that, of course, but it probably means at least that Sanders will fight on past tonight.Virginia is too close to call between Trump and Rubio, according to MSNBC. Meanwhile, in Vermont, MSNBC says the race is “too early to call,” but it says Trump is battling John Kasich there. A Vermont victory for Kasich would be a surprise, as he was not expected to win any Super Tuesday states.As the clock strikes 7 p.m., CNN projects that Clinton is the winner of Georgia and Virginia, and that Sanders takes his home state of Vermont.While Republican primary voters may be ready to embrace an outsider candidate, Democratic primary voters appear to be looking for just the opposite. That’s one of the takeaways from an ABC News analysis of exit poll results from the Democratic primary in Super Tuesday states. “Democratic primary voters overwhelmingly want the next president to be someone with political experience rather than someone from outside the political establishment,” ABC reports. That trend will likely help Hillary Clinton win votes. Another trend that could help Clinton, who has positioned herself as the president’s political heir, while potentially dealing a blow to her rival Bernie Sanders: “With the exception of Vermont, more voters across today’s primaries want to see a continuation of Obama’s policies (four in 10 to seven in 10), than would like a more liberal agenda implemented.”The New York Times came out with a useful map this week showing when voting ends in Super Tuesday states. The first polls to close—at 7 p.m. ET—are in Vermont, Virginia, and Georgia. We can probably expect the networks to call these races well before other states’ voting ends. The last state to close up shop today will be Alaska, whose GOP caucus-going will end at midnight East Coast time. FiveThirtyEight doesn’t anticipate a blowout for any one candidate in Alaska, though, so it advises East Coasters to go to bed rather than wait for those results.ABC News is out with an analysis of early exit poll results from the Republican primary race in Super Tuesday states. The results so far indicate that plenty of voters are dissatisfied with the political status quo and looking for an outsider candidate, a trend that stands to benefit Donald Trump, a contender who has appealed to voters by railing against the political establishment and promising he’s not a typical politician. Excluding Texas and Vermont, “at least half of voters in preliminary exit poll results across the Super Tuesday states want the next president to be from outside the political establishment,” ABC reports. Frustration with Washington looks like a theme of the night as well. “Many GOP primary voters also are angry with the government in Washington, DC.,” the analysis concludes, “ranging from a third in Massachusetts to half in Texas, and nearly all of them are at least dissatisfied.”In some states, including Virginia and Georgia, candidates who've already dropped out of the race are still included on ballots today. In Virginia, candidates who've exited the race have to contact the state's elections department and formally withdraw in order for their names to be removed​, Washingtonian reports. (Martin O'Malley, for example, didn't do that, and thus voters can still cast their ballots for him.) In Georgia, according to a report from Macon’s ​The Telegraph​, the secretary of state “did not authorize changes in the ballot, which is printed weeks in advance,” so there many extra candidates listed. For voters who've diligently kept track of the once-bloated primary, these extra names probably aren't a big deal. But they almost certainly will cause confusion for some voters.And at least in Georgia, polling workers aren't permitted to tell voters which candidates have dropped out. Instead, one county supervisor says they can double-check who's in the running online or by calling the secretary of state's office directly. That's troublesome for voters without ready access to technology or the patience to delay their vote while they find out more. "I hate it because if they vote for any of the candidates who have withdrawn, it's just a wasted vote," the official told the ​Telegraph​.Ben Carson’s campaign doesn’t want you to forget that he’s still running for president.The Republican presidential candidate wants to convene a meeting of the candidates out of concern over a “lack of civility” in the GOP primary race, his campaign announced on Tuesday. Carson’s show of concern is in keeping with his denunciation of “hateful rhetoric” on both sides of the aisle last year. But the move also reads as a last-ditch effort to gin up publicity for a candidate whose campaign chairman recently told the Washington Examiner: “We clearly don’t know. We don’t have a well defined path to victory.”  Carson’s chiding of the Republican field comes amid a flare-up of insult-trading among the candidates ahead of Super Tuesday. “This race has taken a turn for the worse, to the point of embarrassment on the world stage,” Carson said in a statement released by his campaign. He warned that “a house divided cannot stand,” and called for a show of GOP unity. According to the campaign, Carson started “reaching out to each candidate personally by phone” on Tuesday in an attempt to arrange the rendezvous, which he hopes will take place ahead of the Republican primary debate set for Thursday. No word yet on whether the meeting, if it happens, will take place in a storage closet.Mary Katherine Ham says on CNN that Donald Trump is the story today: “We’re talking about the things he might not win.” For that reason, Republicans opposed to the frontrunner are coming to terms with the possibility that he will be their nominee––and some are rallying around the hashtag #neverTrump, a phenomenon Megan McArdle delved into in a fascinating column yesterday. In it, she summarizes the scores of emails she received from these Republicans. "These people are not quietly concerned about Trump. They are appalled, repulsed, afraid and dismayed that their party could have let this happen,” she explained. "They wrote in the strongest possible language, and many were adamant that they would not stay home on Election Day, but in fact would vote for Hillary Clinton in the general and perhaps leave the Republican Party for good.”Acknowledging that her correspondents aren’t anything like a scientific sample, she added, "I got everything from college students to Midwestern farmers to military intelligence officers to former officials in Republican administrations, one of whom said he would “tattoo #NeverTrump” on a rather delicate part of his anatomy if it would keep Donald J. Trump from becoming the nominee. They were from all segments of the party—urban professionals, yes, but also stalwart evangelicals, neoconservatives, libertarians, Tea Partiers, the whole patchwork of ideological groups of which the Republican coalition is made."I wonder how big their faction is.Back in January, Marco Rubio’s team touted what National Review charitably termed an “an unconventional path to winning the GOP primary contest.” It involved finishing third in Iowa, second in New Hampshire, and first in South Carolina. The Florida senator was trying to convince backers and funders to stick with him, even if he got shellacked in the Hawkeye State. His “3-2-1” strategy promised to make a virtue of losing.He executed the first step flawlessly, getting drubbed in Iowa by Cruz and Trump. In New Hampshire, instead of just losing to one rival, he over-performed—losing to four. And in South Carolina, where he was supposed to stop losing? Donald Trump almost doubled his share of the vote, and he finished second. By the time the results were tallied in Nevada, he’d gone from 3-2-1 to 3-5-2-2.Now Rubio is looking at a bleak electoral landscape. Politico reports that his campaign spent Tuesday morning trying to lower expectations among his backers—sketching one scenario in which he walks away from the day’s voting with fewer than 100 delegates. It quotes one source saying the campaign emphasized “their convention strategy was not contingent on winning any states.” The new pitch is that Rubio can be an effective spoiler, keeping Trump from securing the requisite 1,237 delegates before the end of April, and forcing the race into a convention floor fight.Trump promises supporters that “we will have so much winning if I get elected, that you may get bored with winning.” If they do, apparently, they can turn to Rubio for a change of pace.In many states that are voting today, the presidential candidates are not the only ones on the ballot. Members of the House and Senate are facing primary elections, and while these don’t get nearly as much attention as the White House race, just ask former House Majority Leader Eric Cantor about the perils of overlooking them.Two primaries to watch are those involving Senator Richard Shelby in Alabama and Representative Kevin Brady of Texas, who just recently succeeded Speaker Paul Ryan as chairman of the powerful Ways and Means Committee. Shelby, 81, is the Republican chairman of the Banking Committee who was first elected to the Senate as a Democrat in 1986. (He switched to the GOP in 1994.) He has spent heavily to fend off four primary challengers, and the Washington Post reported that the national GOP campaign committee quietly sent staffers to Alabama to help him across the finish line.A reliable but not fanatical conservative serving his 10th House term, Brady is also facing multiple challengers from the right in his Texas district. The risk for him is that if he does not win an outright majority of the vote, he’ll be forced into a runoff election in May. Two years ago, conservatives in Texas used the runoff rules to knock off 91-year-old Ralph Hall, who was then the oldest member of the House.Although health care polls behind the economy and foreign policy among the issues for Democratic voters, Clinton beats the rest of the field in voter trust on health care issues.Why is that important? Super Tuesday states aren’t very healthy. Five of the Super Tuesday states are among the 10 lowest-ranking states on America’s Health Rankings. Aside from Arkansas, they are also states that did not expand Medicaid to all low-income adults as per the original intent of the Affordable Care Act. South Carolina is also on both of these lists, and Clinton won it with ease.It may seem curious that people left behind so thoroughly by one health-care reform might reject another shot at it, but the CNN poll underscores that low-income people in these states might not have the risk tolerance in the primaries to accept a thinly explained and experimental approach such as Sanders’s Medicare-for-all.Pundits have proven to be dismal predictors of this race, and polling's limits are well-known. But Seth Stephens-Davidowitz, an ex-Google data whiz who contributes to The New York Times, found an intriguing new prognostication tool: Google's search results.As Justin Wolfers noted for the Times, Google search trends can now be tracked with incredible granularity compared to previous elections. It's now possible to see which candidate names are looked up most often in a specific state while the polls are open. But even more interestingly, there's a solid correlation between those trends and the actual outcomes of the races. Check out the graph in the tweet below.Uncanny, right? But others have thrown cold water on their predictive power, especially in upcoming states.The Republican political strategist Patrick Ruffini pointed out on Twitter that voters in the early states might be more enthusiastic than elsewhere, and that there were significant divergences between the search trends and the actual results in Nevada's caucuses last month. With a large and diverse glut of states voting on Super Tuesday, tonight should be a good test of search trends' forecasting utility.Purported results of early exit poll results are starting to be shared on social media.There are a variety of reasons to take these numbers with a healthy dose of skepticism—which is why we’re not sharing them here. For starters, the official numbers haven’t been released by members of the consortium of news organizations that gathers them—and the results being shared are so varied, that some are certainly false. But even the real numbers would be of limited utility right now.They’re only being gathered in nine of the states that are voting today, so they won’t reveal the full national picture. They rely on interviewers, who approach voters as they exit the polls. Many voters decline to take the time to fill out detailed surveys, and that skews the data. The results will eventually be adjusted to reflect the actual composition of the electorate, as votes are tallied, but at this stage, they’re just raw numbers. They’re compiled in a series of waves; evening voters may break in a different direction. Moreover, in some Super Tuesday states, early voting and absentee ballots are popular. The exit polls there are supplemented with telephone surveys, then blended based on expected turnout. But that introduces even more untested assumptions into the mix.As actual numbers get released by the networks, pay attention to the demographic questions, and to those about voter sentiment—and try to ignore the horserace figures until the votes are actually counted. Exit polls are quite useful for understanding what’s already happened, but they’re a lousy tool for predicting who will finish ahead in a tight race.Ted Cruz and his family went to a polling location Houston, Texas to cast their ballot.As David noted, Cruz has a lot riding on today’s results, particularly in his home state of Texas.Gary Johnson, the former New Mexico governor running to be the Libertarian Party's presidential nominee, floats an idea for candidate-less voters out there: They should take a look at his campaign.Given Johnson's ideological leanings, he could be speaking to a large swath of voters disappointed in what the two major parties are offering this cycle. His social liberalism—he's pro-gay marriage, pro-abortion rights (up till a later point in a woman's pregnancy), and enthusiastically pro-marijuana legalization—could appeal to disaffected Democrats, who can't stomach supporting another Clinton or a big-government, Democratic socialist-backed revolution. Yet his fiscal conservatism—he's known for railing against the national debt and the current tax system—could play to Republican voters who feel they've been left with no options. One group that could potentially see Johnson as an option: former Rand Paul supporters who appreciated the senator's libertarian leanings.Earlier this year, Johnson told me he has “no delusions of grandeur” about his 2016 bid, his second run at the presidency. But he wants to make sure his voice is heard at the most competitive level available.Earlier, I wrote about where Marco Rubio has the best chances to pull out a win on Tuesday. How about Bernie Sanders?The Vermonter has a much better shot at notching at least one win on Tuesday. One reason is that demonym: Sanders’s own home state is voting, and according to FiveThirtyEight, he has a greater than 99 percent chance of winning there. Unfortunately for Sanders, there are only 26 delegates to be split among the candidates.But Sanders has also been putting in some quality time in several other states that vote today, especially Massachusetts, Oklahoma, and Minnesota. Those are very different states—one New England, one Midwestern, one at the edge of the Great Plains—with disparate political landscapes. What they have in common is a heavy share of white voters in the Democratic electorate, which has been Sanders’s strength so far. Massachusetts, of course, is a special test. It’s notoriously liberal, and it’s also the home of Elizabeth Warren, the progressive hero whose decision not to run for president opened up a path for Sanders. As one Bay State Democrat told The Wall Street Journal, “If Bernie can’t win in Massachusetts, where does he win?”On the eve of Super Tuesday, the New Hampshire Union Leader released an editorial apologizing for its endorsement of Chris Christie:Watching Christie kiss the Donald’s ring this weekend — and make excuses for the man Christie himself had said was unfit for the presidency — demonstrated how wrong we were. Rather than standing up to the bully, Christie bent his knee. In doing so, he rejected the very principles of his campaign that attracted our support.The publisher of the New Hampshire Union Leader, Joseph W. McQuaid, who has criticized Donald Trump in the past, penned the editorial.Trump won the New Hampshire primary in February, and last week received the endorsement of the New Jersey governor in what was a pivotal moment for the race. Christie, who dropped out after a sixth-place finish in the state’s primary, has been one of the real-estate mogul’s biggest “establishment” gets.It’s powerful conventional wisdom that Donald Trump is set for a great day today, and any day that’s good for Trump is probably bad for Marco Rubio. What are the potential bright spots for the Florida senator—and leading anti-Trump contender—on Super Tuesday?One possibility is Minnesota. Nate Cohn tabs it as Rubio’s best shot for a win, pointing to Rubio’s tight finish in Iowa, a demographically similar state, as essential. Rubio also has strong institutional support in Minnesota (though where doesn’t he?). But the case partly depends on low turnout, which hasn’t been the trend so far in this primary. In any event, Rubio’s stopping off in Minneapolis today.Another hope for Rubio isn’t a state: It’s a commonwealth. As National Journal’s Adam Wollner reports, Virginia is full of the wealthier, better-educated voters who have formed the core of Rubio’s support throughout the race. But much of the rest of the state is more rural and working class—in other words, just the folks who tend to break for Trump.Either of these are tenuous hopes, though. Rubio isn’t favored to win a single state. It could be a long night for the Floridian. At least he’s well accustomed to coming in behind the leader by now.Conventional wisdom has it that Hillary Clinton is the Democrats’ best bet in the general election. She’s experienced, establishment, and most importantly, not a socialist. And yet, according to the latest CNN/ORC poll, things are not at all so clear cut. In fact, it’s Sanders who has the edge. Although both Clinton and Sanders each beat Trump in a general-election matchup, Clinton does so by 8 points; Sanders by a whopping 17 points. What’s more, Sanders handily beats Ted Cruz by 12 points and Marco Rubio by 8. But Clinton? She loses to both Cruz and Rubio—albeit by razor-thin margins.It brings to mind Christopher Cook’s pragmatic case for the revolutionary in these pages, in which he argues that Clinton’s exaltation of bipartisan-compromise politics gives away too much before negotiations even begin—and that Sanders’s sincerity and progressive platform at least strive for greatness. The question is: Will the upstart senator from Vermont lose his shot the nomination before he ever has a chance to win the general?Today in strange bedfellows, Louis Farrakhan has kind words for Donald Trump. The longtime Nation of Islam leader’s reasons are plainly anti-Semitic. Trump “is the only member who has stood in front of Jewish community, and said I don’t want your money. Any time a man can say to those who control the politics of America, ‘I don’t want your money,’ that means you can’t control me,” Farrakhan said, according to an Anti-Defamation League transcript.Farrakhan is apparently referring to Trump’s painful appearance at the Republican Jewish Coalition, where he said he supported Israel but didn’t want attendees’ money, and made several anti-Semitic jokes. (Trump’s stance on Israel, where it is discernible, appears tougher than other Republicans’.) But Farrakhan stopped short of endorsing the Republican. “Not that I’m for Mr. Trump, but I like what I’m looking at.” Sure, Trump has spoken about banning Muslims from the country, and has flirted with former KKK leader David Duke, but Farrakhan’s bigotry toward Jews is strong enough to make him overlook those statements. It reminds me of nothing so much as when Esquire found a set of white supremacists who, for various reasons, were surprisingly O.K. with Barack Obama.Paul Ryan seemed to give Super Tuesday voters an implicit warning this morning: Don't vote for Trump. Ryan, no fan of the Republican frontrunner, must be watching his the House Republican caucus with dismay in the last week, as four of his colleagues publicly endorsed Trump. And at a House leadership press briefing Tuesday, Ryan condemned Trump’s recent waffling on the endorsement of former KKK leader David Duke and other white supremacist groups, and reminded reporters that “there is a lot at stake” as voters hit the polls today.Ryan said that while he tries to stay out of the “day-to-day ups and downs of the primary,” he'll speak up when something on the trail “runs counter” to the ideals of the Republican party and the country. Today was such a day.“I want to be very clear about something: If a person wants to be the nominee of the Republican party, there can be no evasion and no games. They must reject any group or cause that is built on bigotry,” Ryan said. “This party does not prey on people's prejudices. We appeal to their highest ideals. This is the party of Lincoln. We believe all people are created equal in the eyes of God and our government. This is fundamental. And if someone wants to be our nominee, they must understand this.”But despite his visible agitation Tuesday, Ryan insisted to a reporter his plans for endorsement haven't changed: He’s still going to back the Republican nominee. Ryan will be in quite the bind if that nominee ends up being Trump.You can tell how confident Hillary Clinton’s campaign is—and how confident Democrats are about her prospects—by the fact that even before Super Tuesday polls have closed, there’s already plenty of speculation about whom she might choose as a running mate. On Monday, Yahoo reported that one name floating around in leftist circles is Tom Perez, the secretary of labor and former head of the civil-rights division at the Department of Justice.Perez has his positives—because he’s a strong progressive, choosing him might help to motivate members of the Elizabeth Warren-Bernie Sanders wing of the Democratic Party upset about a Sanders primary loss. But it might be wise to be skeptical. One of Clinton’s signal weaknesses is as a campaigner. She just doesn’t have the stump skill that some other politicians do. And Perez is an unproven quantity in that respect. He’s only held one elected office—and that was on the Montgomery County Council in Maryland. The last time either party chose a running mate with so little elected experience was when Democrat George McGovern tabbed Sargent Shriver as his running mate in 1972. They got shellacked by Richard Nixon.Minority voters are likely to play a significant role in today’s nominating contests. On the Democratic front, Hillary Clinton is hoping that African American voters will help her secure the nomination. In South Carolina, she garnered 87 percent of the black vote, giving her campaign momentum coming into Super Tuesday. She’ll be looking to secure a similar victory in southern states, like Georgia and Alabama.Meanwhile, on the Republican side, two Cuban American senators are trying to gain traction with Latino voters. In the Nevada Republican caucuses, exit polls showed Donald Trump with a commanding lead among Latinos, but that’s not necessarily representative of how Latinos will vote across the country. (They made up only 8 percent of caucus goers in Nevada.) Still, it suggested that Ted Cruz and Marco Rubio can’t take their support for granted.Their votes will be particularly important in states like Texas where Latinos make up about 28 percent of eligible voters.Is Tuesday the end of the line for Ted Cruz? The Texas senator has run a fantastic campaign, and he’s gotten much farther than many pundits—or the colleagues who loathe him in Washington—would have predicted. But the limitations of his strategy are starting to become clear. Cruz had three tricks up his sleeve: powerful financial backing, the chance to piggyback on Donald Trump, and evangelical voters. The first holds. The second got him a long way, but at some point he finally had to break with Trump, and so far he hasn’t been able to get out ahead of him. The third has been the real problem. Even in South Carolina, with its high proportion of evangelicals, Cruz only managed a third-place finish.That makes Super Tuesday effectively make or break. As Katie Glueck reports today, the “SEC Primary” was always intended to be Cruz’s firewall—a set of Southern, religious states that would save him even if the first few contests didn’t go well. Instead, Glueck writes:Cruz walks into March 1 on his heels. He failed spectacularly in South Carolina, the first test of his appeal in the South, and is now on the defensive even in his home state of Texas. And if polls are to be believed, he could lose it all on Tuesday to Donald Trump.If Cruz wins only Texas—and especially if he loses it—his shot at the nomination is probably over. But don’t expect him to drop out, warns Joshua Green: “Dropping out would violate the logic of Cruz's whole political career. And anyone acquainted with his character and ambition should probably assume, as I do, that he won’t.” One major reason: Losing in 2016 but putting up a good fight would be perfect positioning for a 2020 run.Bernie Sanders isn't keeping his Super Tuesday vote secret. The Democratic presidential candidate proudly proudly declared that he voted for himself, a moment captured on video by reporters. “I will tell you, after a lot of thought, I voted for me for president,” Sanders told the crowd immediately after snapping a selfie with someone at a polling place in Burlington, Vermont.Sanders faces an uphill climb today as voters pick winners in the Democratic primary contest in a number of states. Clinton unquestionably has momentum coming off of her recent South Carolina primary win and it remains to be seen if Sanders can expand his appeal. For now, however, Sanders is projecting confidence. When asked how he was feeling, Sanders replied: “Feeling great.”It wasn’t supposed to be like this.A year ago, the 2016 presidential election looked like a battle between the Clintons and the Bushes. So formidable did Jeb and Hillary seem, that many promising candidates stayed on the sidelines. Bush would simply have to move past a field of presidential also-rans, less-prominent governors, and first-term senators to claim his birthright. The primary hurdle in Clinton’s path to her coronation was a banjo player in a Celtic rock band, who used to be governor of Maryland.But as voters head to the polls on Tuesday, they face a pair of unexpectedly tight races. Bush is gone. So is Rick Santorum, the runner-up in 2012, and a half-dozen other candidates with equally distinguished resumes. But Ben Carson, a pediatric neurosurgeon, is still running, despite never having held public office. So are Ohio Governor John Kasich, and Senators Ted Cruz and Marco Rubio. As, of course, is the man they’re all trying to beat—Donald Trump.Martin O’Malley has left the race, and resumed touring with his band. Clinton’s real challenge, it turned out, came from an even less probable quarter: a septuagenarian democratic socialist senator from Vermont. Bernie Sanders inspired fervent support from young voters, tapped into pent-up frustration with the status quo, and fought Clinton to an effective draw in Iowa before trouncing her in New Hampshire, and producing a strong showing in Nevada. Then, on Saturday, Clinton pulled off the win she so desperately needed, as black voters in South Carolina rallied to her standard.Now, the man who promised to deliver a political revolution is struggling to remain relevant in the Democratic race, while a candidate who many dismissed as irrelevant to the Republican race has instead delivered a political revolution.Voting kicked off on Monday in New Zealand, where Sanders pulled off a decisive win. It will conclude on 1 a.m. Eastern time on Wednesday, when the Alaska caucuses close. In all, voters will cast ballots in twelve states, one territory, and—for Democrats—throughout the global diaspora. Some 865 Democratic delegates, and 595 Republican delegates, will be awarded when the votes are tallied. Each jurisdiction has its own, idiosyncratic rules for translating votes into delegates; those differences are likely to loom particularly large in the GOP race.The states voting on Tuesday are heavily concentrated in the South, with Texas awarding the largest pile of delegates. In the Democratic race, Bernie Sanders has been focusing on states like Minnesota and Massachusetts, stocked with the white, liberal voters who have supported him so far. Among the Republicans, Ted Cruz has concentrated on carrying his native Texas and other evangelical-friendly Southern states, while Marco Rubio has invested in states with higher numbers of better-educated, more affluent voters. But as Trump expands his appeal among both the blue-collar evangelicals on whom Cruz relies, and the white-collar professionals who form Rubio’s base of support, both senators are less focused on outperforming Trump overall than on finding someplace—anyplace—where they can actually win.Clinton and Trump hope to emerge with prohibitive leads in the race for delegates—their rivals hope to blunt their edge, and prove the race isn’t over yet. When the votes are tallied on Tuesday night, the shape of this unpredictable race is likely to be substantially more clear.Follow along with us throughout the day, as we bring you reports from the primaries and caucuses, and vote tallies as they become available. Read up on the race with our 2016 Distilled election dashboard, find out more about the candidates by using our 2016 Cheat Sheet.—Yoni Appelbaum


jdudkiewicz::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 6:23 PM::<comment>*Drumpf</comment>

jdudkiewicz::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 6:42 PM::<comment>Pathetic little fat man, no one's bloody laughingThe clown that no one laughs at,they all just wish he'd die.He's so depressed at being hated,fatso takes his own life.  -David Bowiehttps://www.youtube.com/watch?...</comment>

jdudkiewicz::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 6:48 PM::<comment>Seems pretty clear, perhaps your obtuseness is willful and deliberate?</comment>

jdudkiewicz::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:03 PM::<comment>Why hide his heritage? He should be proud of it, if he followed the advice he gives to others.</comment>

jdudkiewicz::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:32 PM::<comment>He chided John Stewart for not using his real name of Leibowitz. Only fair to give him the same treatment. I never anglicized my name. How could you possibly disagree?http://gawker.com/donald-trump...</comment>

George::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:02 PM::<comment>True. Trump iis one giant hypocrite. His real talent, though, has been in clarifying the Republican brand. Mexicans are rapists? No pushback. Calling women bimbos? No pushback. Do lots of torture? No pushback. Silence implies consent. And massive cheering implies consent.</comment>

jdudkiewicz::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 10:12 PM::<comment>His general hypocrisy and temperament are the concerns here. Any other response to this new information or is it cognitive dissonance time for you?</comment>

24AheadDotCom::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 12:49 AM::<comment>This "Drumpf" thing is from a lackey working for one of the biggest media conglomerates around. He also supports very pro-corporate mass immigration (and lied about it in the segment).Don't be a sheep.</comment>

jdudkiewicz::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 4:08 AM::<comment>Drumpf hired illegal immigrants. Drumpf himself does not dispute this.</comment>

OpulentFatcat::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:14 PM::<comment>See his pug nose face! Pug Pug, Pug Pug!</comment>

m w::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:36 PM::<comment>He told people he was Dutch. His father told people he was Swedish. Why didn't Donald just pick one and stick to it?</comment>

Lucy Ndesquise::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 12:21 AM::<comment>most "White" people are many different things and the family story have changed so much over time that they don't really even know their ancestry a lot of the times.</comment>

DaveMD::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 2:07 AM::<comment>Is that supposed to be clever?</comment>

jdudkiewicz::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 4:08 AM::<comment>Shouldn't the man have to play by his own rules?</comment>

DaveMD::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 4:13 AM::<comment>Which rules are those?</comment>

registered_with_discus::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:37 PM::<comment>And KKK!</comment>

Jiffy Pop::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 6:11 PM::<comment>I bet the super delegates vote for Hillary.</comment>

Terry::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 6:19 PM::<comment>most of them already have committed to Hillary, they needed to in order to get money from the DNC.</comment>

peterw::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 6:55 PM::<comment>Where did this super delegate meme come from?in 2008 the super delegates pledged to Hilary too.  Guess what happened?  they slowly shifted over to Obama as he started winning.</comment>

Terry::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:09 PM::<comment>It's not new, listen to the Clinton campaign, they declared victory in Iowa because of their 'insurmountable' which included the super-delegates.As a party outsider, Bernie will need to win by huge margins in a large number of states to move the super-delegates. These are party insiders, many of whom have accepted money from the Hillary Victory Fund through the DNC to secure their support.  Bernie is a party outsider who just joined the Dems.</comment>

peterw::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:35 PM::<comment>The super delegates are highly unlikely to buck to popular vote</comment>

Terry::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:49 PM::<comment>And yet, that is their sole purpose.Ask the DNC who 'won' New Hampshire.</comment>

peterw::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:54 PM::<comment>Same thing happened in 2008.  the Super Delegates came around to Obama eventually.</comment>

Terry::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:12 PM::<comment>that's why the DNC added the payoff element of the Victory Fund, they don't make the same mistake twice.</comment>

m w::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:47 PM::<comment>Delegates do more than vote at the convention--they vote on the platform and vote on rules.</comment>

J. Smith::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 1:51 AM::<comment>Of course most of them will, because she will get a majority of the votes - also she is actually a member of the Democratic party. It doesn't help that angry young Sanders' supporters have literally been calling the superdelegates and threatening to harm them if they don't vote the "right" way.</comment>

Deus ex iguana::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 6:32 PM::<comment>Donald Trump was on Sean Hannity last night for a half an hour and we got to hear what he stands for in a non confrontational interview.  This is a totally real person and so different from the fictional Trump the media has created in its Bizarowold alternate universe.  Trump will win today and there is no doubt he will be the Republican nominee.  There will be no "brokered convention" and if the neo-cuckservatives run a pro-top 1% pro-Israel puppet then it will not make any difference.  </comment>

John Straka::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:03 PM::<comment>I can't find a transcript anywhere and can't watch it at the moment. What positions did he describe that haven't been mentioned (or have been in your opinion misinterpreted) by the media?</comment>

Off the Grid::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:16 PM::<comment>It was good to hear him talk without being interrupted.</comment>

Deus ex iguana::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:44 PM::<comment>YES!</comment>

Deus ex iguana::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:40 PM::<comment>That is too broad a question.</comment>

I-RIGHT-I::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:31 PM::<comment>"...and if the neo-cuckservatives run a pro-top 1% pro-Israel puppet."President the Donald and Bibi are going to get along famously, they are much alike seems to me. At least I hope The Donald is like Bibi.</comment>

Deus ex iguana::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:41 PM::<comment>I love Israel, I actually lived there a good while and learned the local language.  I just think we need sanity on this issue.  Trump will finally bring some sanity.</comment>

I-RIGHT-I::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:48 PM::<comment>I'm a little insane I guess because as far as I'm concerned the Nation Israel can do no wrong in their own defense.</comment>

Deus ex iguana::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:53 PM::<comment>I am very supportive of the defense of Israel.  Of course they can do wrong.  What about the settlements?  Do you know the occupation has gone on since 1967 and the occupied are denied basic human rights that we take for granted here?</comment>

John832::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:37 PM::<comment>The real question is what he'll stand for once elected.  He previously stood for plenty of things that, based on what he is saying now, he no longer does.</comment>

John832::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:40 PM::<comment>Speaking of Israel, the Jewish Journal sure seems to like Hillary.It's almost like both parties are owned by the same interests, but based on your comments I assume you're a partisan hack and will deny it."Clinton’s record on supporting Israel is as strong as they come, and this speech makes clear that Israel will have no stronger partner than her as the next president."http://www.jewishjournal.com/o...</comment>

Deus ex iguana::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:43 PM::<comment>I am not a partisan hack.   I used to be, but for the Democrats.  Then, I started learning about the crazy people who were on my side and I ran for the hills.  AIPAC is a very powerful lobby.  We need common sense in the Middle East.  I think Trump the dealmaker can bring it.</comment>

m w::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:10 PM::<comment>Why did Netanyahu refuse to let Trump visit Israel? How can Trump negotiate on the middle east when he won't allow Muslims to visit the US and has stated his admiration for Putin?</comment>

1Pokey4::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 11:20 PM::<comment>Wow! Two fraudulant gasbags spoke to each other on Fox.</comment>

Lucy Ndesquise::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 12:30 AM::<comment>For sure.  All the Anti-Trumpers have only listened to the sound bites, which admittedly are awful.. But if you listen to what he wants to do and how common sense it is, well it could actually save this country.  Bringing manufacturing back home could be the most important thing to turn this country around that any candidate is talking about, and no ones talking about it more convincingly than Trump.   But I do hope he builds a virtual wall with drones and cameras instead of an actually physical wall.   No need to blight some of the most beautiful countryside building a wall when a full on surveillance grid with drones and cameras and patrols would be more effective and more dynamic and is recommended by those in the know.</comment>

new_york_loner::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 6:44 PM::<comment>Fourth paragraph from the bottom: "Voting kicked off on Monday in New Zealand, where Sanders pulled off a decisive win."New Zealand has joined the union of American states?</comment>

John Straka::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 6:47 PM::<comment>Bernie was elected prime minister of the Shire.</comment>

new_york_loner::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 6:52 PM::<comment>Boy, they kept that under the radar... 102 US Senators now... how will this affect the EC system?</comment>

TomLuTon::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:20 PM::<comment>I think the word is 'Thain'</comment>

FireWraith::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:53 PM::<comment>Expatriates, i.e. US citizens living/working there. Apparently 27 people gathered in a pub to vote (which sounds like an awesome way to vote, to me).</comment>

PeaceInk::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 6:49 PM::<comment>The GOP has been sowing its fields to reap an invasive weed like Trump for 30 years. Enjoy the fruits of your labor.</comment>

John832::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:43 PM::<comment>Nothing produces better results for the GOP than a hated Democrat as President.  And nothing produces worse results for them than a bad President from their party.  If the Republican party were smart they wouldn't run anybody and instead throw all their resources into Congressional campaigns with the slogan "Hillary is going to be your next president, how are we going to stop her agenda"?</comment>

Strong Anon::Thursday, March 3, 2016 6:11 AM::<comment>The same boring lines over and over again. When did the left become the reactionaries?</comment>

Arcite::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 6:50 PM::<comment>Journalists should practice writing, Madame President.</comment>

new_york_loner::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 6:52 PM::<comment>The extreme close-up shot of Donald trump that accompanies this article is not flattering.  The Atlantic must have gone through  hundreds, perhaps thousands of images, to find that particular one.  Trump looks downright satanic in that shot.The major US media are all on full attack mode; their mission: Destroy Trump.</comment>

Arcite::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 6:55 PM::<comment>He's an overweight, puffy, balding, over-tanned 70 year old; photoshop doesn't work miracles.</comment>

new_york_loner::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:00 PM::<comment>Trump looks like a descendant of Genghis Khan in that shot.  Hmmm...</comment>

new_york_loner::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:06 PM::<comment>They removed a comment below that I wanted to reply to...Courageousmisterj"s comment about Hillary... I did not see any TOS violation in that comment.</comment>

Brent Fraser::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:36 PM::<comment>Anything but Obongo</comment>

peterw::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:37 PM::<comment>yeah thats a compelling case for who I want to be my president</comment>

The Professor::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:41 PM::<comment>You mean to compare her with First Lady Bill, right?</comment>

new_york_loner::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:59 PM::<comment>First Lady Melania Trump, or First Gentleman Bill Clinton?Hottest FL since Jackie O., or a horny Eminence Grise?</comment>

limoman::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:16 PM::<comment>They are learning from us ;)</comment>

Deus ex iguana::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:03 PM::<comment>It only seems to help him.  I keep saying this.  When people know the candidate and have formulated an opinion already, then character assassination backfires.  They feel both insulted and attacked themselves.</comment>

trythemiddle::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:21 PM::<comment>Smug and surly with racoon make-up, a bad tan and a worse hairpiece, pointing aggressively.  Nope that's your guy.</comment>

new_york_loner::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:03 PM::<comment>Davy Crockett went to Washington wearing a coonskin cap; Trump is going to Washington wearing a signature pompadour... both men were on the frontiers of their day.What's not to like?</comment>

trythemiddle::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:35 PM::<comment>I don't mind his looks.  They are comical.  It his personality, beliefs and actions that I don't like.</comment>

JohnnyReason::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:53 PM::<comment>I'm a Democrat and even I agree.</comment>

Ted Wayne Gacy::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:04 PM::<comment>That's what Trump looks like.  If it frightens you, vote for Cruz.</comment>

Thirdsyphon::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:04 PM::<comment>Perhaps; but in all fairness Trump is a sort of human camel - funny looking from almost any angle, and half the angles that aren't funny look satanic.</comment>

TomLuTon::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:18 PM::<comment>The Atlantic frequently, if not always, uses bad photos of politicians. From all sides.</comment>

QFAs::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:58 PM::<comment>Looks like the photographer did their best; he is orange after all, with a small rodent on his head.</comment>

thorninyourside::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 6:56 PM::<comment>Todays CNN/ORC poll shows Sanders as the only candidate with a positive approval rating. The only cnadidate.Sanders beats all of em head-to-head.HRC has had a negative rating for almost 30 years, NO ONE has ever won with a negative rating, EVER.</comment>

Taran Wanderer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 6:57 PM::<comment>Well...someone has to win, and if HRC goes against Trump, they'll both have a negative rating. Maybe it's the year of Gary Johnson?</comment>

Deus ex iguana::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:01 PM::<comment>The Democrat race is over.  Sanders has no chance whatsoever.  It's donesky.</comment>

new_york_loner::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:12 PM::<comment>If BHO leaves office with a less than 50% approval rating, the next POTUS will be a Republican... this is what history has shown time and again... the Dems have had the WH for 8 years, people naturally want a change after 8 years, especially if the outgoing POTUS has a poor approval rating.Right now, Obama's approval rating is at 48%, according to Gallup polling data.Of course, adding Trump to the equation means that all bets are off... this is getting wild.</comment>

The Anti-Monitor::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:30 PM::<comment>There was a guy on the radio this morning ranting about how he wasn't allowed to vote in the primaries because he's independent.  I don't think he gets how primaries work.(I say this as an independent voter myself--I get the sentiment, but I inherently understand that I'm not a member of a party, so it's not my candidate to vote on.)</comment>

m w::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:34 PM::<comment>Some states allow independents to choose which primary to participate in--called open primaries.http://www.uspresidentialelect...</comment>

The Anti-Monitor::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:49 PM::<comment>That's their prerogative, and if they want to do that it's fine, but this guy didn't seem to get that.</comment>

m w::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:58 PM::<comment>Ok, so the parties pick the candidates. But the rules in some states allow voters to pick which party to participate in during a primary because at the general election independents will only be able to choose from those on the ballot.Primary elections began in one party states where whoever got the nomination by the dominant party was the winner in the general election. About 40% of voters are independents--more than either party. However many people who say they are independents vote consistently for one party or the other.http://www.people-press.org/in...</comment>

Brent Fraser::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:32 PM::<comment>Blacks dominating Democratic voters in the South will go overwhelmingly for Hillary.White Southerners will go for resoundingly for Trump, though Cruz will get a decent chunk.</comment>

The Professor::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:32 PM::<comment>Sanders: AL (-) AR (-) CO (+) GA (-) MA (-) MN (+) OK (-) TN (-) TX (-) VT (+) VA (-).</comment>

The Professor::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 3:09 PM::<comment>As predicted, except in OK.</comment>

High420Lonesome::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:32 PM::<comment>So many bitter anti Hillary Clinton posters here, the trump university graduates are by far the worst ranters followed by marco rubio and ted cruz supporters.As for the Bernie Sanders followers? it's good to have illusions!</comment>

Jack dog::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:35 PM::<comment>Trump may well do well today, but he's done after today. He's Unelectable with the KKK issue, Trump U and this fake story about General Pershing and bullets dipped in pig blood. This guy is off the reservation.</comment>

KlugerRD::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:39 PM::<comment>It depends on how much he wins and it he wins Texas.I have been in the Ben Sasse camp. I don't care if Trump is on the "R" line - he will never get my vote and would just not vote for President. But will hope for a legitimate third party candidate.</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:02 PM::<comment>No serious well-known Republican/Conservative is going to destroy himself by taking votes from the GOP and handing the election to the Clintons.</comment>

Ted Wayne Gacy::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:14 PM::<comment>Let's see, Trump is (1) pro-Obamacare; (2) pro-choice; (3) anti-gun owner; and (4) pro-spending.  Before running for election in 2011, most of his donations were to Democrats.  His two highest donations where to HILARY CLINTON and CHARLIE RANGEL, one of the most corrupt Democrats in history.So who exactly is handing victory to the liberals? It seems like Trump is their guy.  You had a huge number of conservatives to choose from in this election, and you chose one of the two liberals in the primary.Cruz for President 2016 and 2020.</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:17 PM::<comment>Sorry clowny - must people have not framed the issues of concern the way you have.  You both exaggerated and grossly ommitted important issues.</comment>

Ted Wayne Gacy::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:36 PM::<comment>Yes, I know, it's all about the "wall" to you.  You don't care about the country's long-term solvency, maintaining American Capitalism, or protecting the Constitution.My comment was for other people who are actually interested in those things.</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:38 PM::<comment>You are the dufus who is onboard with the one-percenters who have been destroying "american capitalism" with free trade, offshore outsourcing of industry, illegals, H1-Bs, etc.Trump is going to help fix that.  Your boys are toast after today.</comment>

Ted Wayne Gacy::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:39 PM::<comment>Trump is going to help destroy American Capitalism.  He's just what liberals needed to push their agenda.</comment>

limoman::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:12 PM::<comment>If a third runs is just makes it easier for Trump.</comment>

sweetjazz3::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:29 PM::<comment>It would depend who runs.  If Bloomberg runs third party, Trump wins easily.  If a conservative like Cruz ran third party (though Cruz is ineligible to do so), that would siphon off support from Trump and likely kill his chances.</comment>

limoman::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:32 PM::<comment>If Cruz cant beat Trump in primaries how could he possibly beat him in the Generals?</comment>

sweetjazz3::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:35 PM::<comment>Oh Cruz or another conservative absolutely could not beat Trump in the general election running as a third party.  All they could do is sabotage his chances and allow Clinton to win easily.There are some movement conservatives who would consider that a better result than Trump winning, though I personally don't think that anything will be organized in time for this possibility to materialize.I think there is some chance Romney throws his name into the ring as third party to save the country from Trump (from his perspective), but he would take an awful beating for a pretty thankless task.  Only because he is a devout Mormon do I think he is even considering the option.</comment>

Jack dog::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:25 PM::<comment>Trump went way too far the last week and he will implode after the race moves past the SEC states.Cruz will win Texas-book it.</comment>

KlugerRD::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:35 PM::<comment>Hope you're right</comment>

Jack dog::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:40 PM::<comment>Nate Silver predicts Cruz wins Texas easily.</comment>

sweetjazz3::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:43 PM::<comment>That looks like what will happen, but it's also probably more likely that Trump pulls an upset in Texas than it is that he loses in any other state today.  He's going to amass a huge swath of delegates.And I think the chances of Kasich winning Ohio AND Rubio winning Florida -- probably the only combination that stops Trump -- is pretty farfetched.I have absolutely NO idea why people take Trump seriously, but they clearly do.  And he has said outrageous things over and over in the campaign, and his poll numbers only go up afterward.  Insane and depressing.</comment>

Jack dog::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:57 PM::<comment>Trump cooped  the Cruz message and dumbed it down and grabbed a lot of the white blue collar voters including many Dems who feel disenfranchised and screwed by Washington. The Cruz playbook was to win Texas and a all these SEC states, but Trump changed all that for now.</comment>

sweetjazz3::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:07 PM::<comment>Cruz's chances at the nomination are now zero.  But I think he stays in the race until the bitter end, because that is the image he has cultivated for himself.  The lone warrior standing tall when all others have ducked for cover.</comment>

Jack dog::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:15 PM::<comment>I think Rubio and Cruz should make a deal like Reagan did in 76' when he ran with Schweiker as his VP. Didn't work in the end, but it might this year.</comment>

sweetjazz3::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:17 PM::<comment>I don't think Cruz is interested in VP, and that ticket can't win without Marco on top.  I could see a Rubio/Kasich merger if they each win their March 15 states.  But prospects are doubtful for each of them in their home states.</comment>

limoman::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:45 PM::<comment>BoY ole Nate is REALLY going out on a thin limb on that one  LOL</comment>

Jack dog::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:51 PM::<comment>Go Blackhawks!</comment>

limoman::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:51 PM::<comment>Statement win on Sunday Vs the Caps</comment>

SatanicPanic::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 5:25 AM::<comment>his record this election is not so hot</comment>

limoman::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 5:26 AM::<comment>He needed a sure thing LOL</comment>

SatanicPanic::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 5:27 AM::<comment>I think he finally admitted he was wrong about Trump</comment>

Xenophon::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 3:23 PM::<comment>In fairness to Nate Silver, Almost nothing about this election has been especially predictable.</comment>

limoman::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:41 PM::<comment>You are missed bud ;)</comment>

creative group::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 4:27 AM::<comment>Cruz only if supporters. He continues to lose. When will reality set in? Looks like a Karl Rove move repeated. We are not losing until we have lost. Deny Deny and Deny.http://lovelace-media.imgix.ne...</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:00 PM::<comment>There is no KKK issue. That is such a pathetic, desperate, last-minute ploy.People who support Trump based on years of being betrayed by the establishment and having their livelihoods crushed are not going to suddenly throw that all away based on some flimsy , transparently bogus, cliched campaign reporters trick.</comment>

m w::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:08 PM::<comment>Do you welcome the support of the KKK and other white supremacists for Trump? Or do you want them to stay away from the campaign?They are making robocalls for Trump.</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:10 PM::<comment>Maybe Obama is making some calls for the KKK. He did endorse Grand Wizard Robert Byrd in 2008.</comment>

m w::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:22 PM::<comment>So is that a yes or no?</comment>

Ted Wayne Gacy::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:38 PM::<comment>I'm confused.  On the one hand, you seem to love race-baiting liberals (Trump), but on the other hand, you seem to hate race-baiting liberals (Obama).</comment>

limoman::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:41 PM::<comment>Confusion is a constant state for you</comment>

Ted Wayne Gacy::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:41 PM::<comment>Thanks, limoman.  I really needed the input of a limousine liberal like you. Aren't you the moron who couldn't find the link below?</comment>

Rururr_Jururr::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 10:52 PM::<comment>"The greatest mistake I ever made was joining the Ku Klux Klan. And I've said that many times. But one cannot erase what he has done. He can only change his ways and his thoughts. That was an albatross around my neck that I will always wear. You will read it in my obituary that I was a member of the Ku Klux Klan. " - Robert ByrdOf course, he must have been lying, because Republicans always tell the truth and Democrats always lie, according to people with the simple minds of toddlers supporting a sports team.</comment>

Dr. King Schultz::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 1:37 AM::<comment>Spud has gone full on native. He's delusional and cornered beyond belief. It's quite sad to watch.</comment>

Jack dog::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:22 PM::<comment>Trump miscalculated by not repudiating Duke or the KKK so as not to alienate the red neck vote. Sorry but he did it on purpose and combined with his past comments about Muslims and Hispanics he can now be painted with the bigot brush. He also told a urban myth about General Pershing and executing Muslims in the Philippians with pigs blood which is patently false as well. The guys campaign has gone off the rails and now that his biz practices have been exposed he wont make after today, no matter how well he does today.</comment>

peterw::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:25 PM::<comment>His followers love that he's full of crap it's his main selling point</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:27 PM::<comment>No, asshat.  Repeating lies does not make them true.Trump has several times denounced the KKK, even recently. Last weekend he had a guy in  a KKK shirt thrown out of his rally.</comment>

Jack dog::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:31 PM::<comment>Dude he played right into the lefts hands and alienated the GOP core. Self inflicted wound and he will lose March 15. He is going to get pounded the next 2 weeks.</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:34 PM::<comment>Nobody cares about your fake issue.  It just makes people more angry at the MSM.</comment>

Dr. King Schultz::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 1:36 AM::<comment>Look at this microcosm of the GOP eating itself alive. Love you guys.</comment>

JohnnyReason::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 6:53 PM::<comment>At least it will be fun to watch neocon shill Hillary squirm. I wonder if she'll brag about killing Gaddafi again.</comment>

trythemiddle::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 3:07 AM::<comment>"No, asshat. Repeating lies does not make them true."I have put that onto a word doc and will insert it into every reply I make to you from now on.  At least I would If I could give two sh!ts about you.Trump being a racist douchebag is a feature, not a bug anyway, right?</comment>

JohnnyReason::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 6:51 PM::<comment>Keep throwing the sphagetti against that wall. The truth is Trump condemned David Duke in 2000 and even refused to join the Reform Party's ticket due to one candidate's apparent ties to Duke. Look it up. Google is your freind.</comment>

trythemiddle::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 7:48 PM::<comment>I know the Trump condemned Duke jn 2000.  What has changed that he wouldn't do it in 2016?  In 2000, he was just a businessman, and turning off a YUUUGE part of your clientele is bad business.  in 2016, when he is running on the Xenophic platform if works.  So at best, he is a snake oil salesman, at worst he is an open racist.  Based off his other actions and speeches, my bet is open racist</comment>

JohnnyReason::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 8:05 PM::<comment>I heard him say repeatedly he disavows Duke in a recent interview. I'm not sure I buy your premise.</comment>

sweetjazz3::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:31 PM::<comment>Jack dog, what will you do in the likely and unfortunate situation that the choice is between Clinton and Trump?  Stay home?  Vote third party?  Hold your nose and vote Trump?</comment>

Jack dog::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:36 PM::<comment>I pray not to have Trump as a nominee and will deal that down the road. He will have to set the record strait on this issue however and moderate. If he gets the nomination I may have to hold my nose and vote for Trump only because of the Supreme Court appointments coming. Ugh.</comment>

sweetjazz3::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:40 PM::<comment>Yeah I feel for you.  Would you consider voting for a Democrat instead of Trump if it was someone besides Clinton (someone more moderate, albeit still more liberal than conservative)?I really wonder what Trump stands for, other than more money and power for himself and being worshiped and glorified by his cult of followers.  I think a lot of his supporters will end up with buyer's remorse should he actually win.As much as I hate to say it, the chances of it being Clinton vs. Trump in the general are greater than 90% right now and probably greater than 95%.</comment>

Jack dog::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:42 PM::<comment>This is the craziest race in my lifetime. Hillary still could be indicted as well which will really get things scrambled.</comment>

sweetjazz3::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:44 PM::<comment>Yeah, we could have Hillary testifying over her personal server and Trump testifying over Trump U at the same time while they are the two major party nominees!  Disgraceful.</comment>

Xenophon::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 3:27 PM::<comment>Maybe, but given how leaky a ship everything to do with Clinton investigations are in Congress. I can't help but think if they really had a bombshell they would have dropped it by now to sabotage the democratic primary</comment>

The Professor::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:35 PM::<comment>Predicted outcome for Trump on Super Tuesday: sweep, except for Texas (Cruz).</comment>

The Professor::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 3:07 PM::<comment>As predicted, except for Minnesota (Rubio). Missed that one. I thought there would be more supporters of former member of the US House of Representatives from the 6th congressional district Michele Bachmann going for Trump.</comment>

Tom Rennick::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:49 PM::<comment>"Voting kicked off on Monday in New Zealand, where Sanders pulled off a decisive win."The moron who wrote this line should be fired. Plain and simple. A misspelling is one thing, but naming a FOREIGN COUNTRY ten thousand miles away as "voting" for Sanders is inexcusably incompetent.That said....VOTE TRUMP!!!</comment>

SpawnofGhosts::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:52 PM::<comment>vote by mail, by Americans living in New Zealandhttp://www.dailymail.co.uk/new...</comment>

Tom Rennick::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:54 PM::<comment>If you had read the article, you would understand that it was not referring to out-of-country voters. The idiot obviously is referring to New HAMPSHIRE, not New Zealand. Again, he should be paid a visit by Donald Trump, and delivered the famous line: "You're fired!"That said... VOTE TRUMP!!!</comment>

SpawnofGhosts::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:55 PM::<comment>Democrats in New Zealand get to claim that honor, casting votes 24 hours before March 1 even starts in the U.S., thanks to the international date line. Just like their Dixville Notch countrymen, the Americans in New Zealand cast votes at midnight, meeting at a pub in Wellington.</comment>

limoman::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:10 PM::<comment>Are you lost sir?</comment>

SpawnofGhosts::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:19 PM::<comment>LOL, no I like to come over here from time to time because I don't have any conflicts in posting.  I haven't even logged into our place yet.</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:20 PM::<comment>our place?</comment>

limoman::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:20 PM::<comment>Yes our place that you will never see ;)</comment>

SatanicPanic::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 5:27 AM::<comment>hello from the other siiiiiiiiide</comment>

limoman::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 5:30 AM::<comment>I was hoping the moron was smart enough to figure out how so I could BL him but he was too stupid even for that Haha</comment>

SatanicPanic::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 5:35 AM::<comment>hahahaha, if I see him I promise I will let you do the honors</comment>

limoman::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:27 PM::<comment>I probably should have done that yesterday LOL</comment>

MumbleMumble::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:58 PM::<comment>If you had clicked the link, you might have saved yourself some embarrassment.</comment>

Captain Nitpick::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:23 PM::<comment>"If you had clicked the link, you might have saved yourself some embarrassment."Likely incapable of embarrassment.</comment>

IowaBeauty::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:05 PM::<comment>So basically you're here to advertise the illiteracy and obstinate ignorance of Trump voters?   New Hampshire voted a couple of weeks ago, the article was referring to expats voting from a pub in New Zealand.</comment>

JohnnyReason::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:51 PM::<comment>The establishment hates Bernie and Trimp for their anti-war stance and criticism of free-trade agreements. If Hillay's surrogates can insinuate that civil rights champ Bernie is a ra cist, there's no telling how far they'd go if he was dominating like Trump.Bernie!</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:01 PM::<comment>Bernie is a filthy communist ... America will never elect a filthy communist</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:57 PM::<comment>There are HUGE numbers of Bernie Sanders supporters who care deeply about the issues of American workers and Wall Street control of the government.If Hillary wins - some will move to Trump - many more will just stay home. The conventional wisdom that they all magically obey like lemmings once Sanders reluctantly fulfills his obligation to tell them to vote for Hillary - I don't see how that logically follows.</comment>

The Anti-Monitor::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 7:59 PM::<comment>I saw some Facebook rant yesterday telling people to vote for Trump over Hillary if Sanders doesn't win the nomination.  I have no idea how popular that sentiment is on the left.  All I know is, this election's going to make for some strange votes.</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:03 PM::<comment>Clearly some Sanders supporters would switch to Hillary, some to Trump some will stay home.  It is too early to know how what will happen with actual numbers.</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:18 PM::<comment>"Facebook rant" ...... well .... there ya go</comment>

m w::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:06 PM::<comment>About 7% of Sanders supporters say they might vote for Trump. About 35% of Republicans say they will not vote for Trump.</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:07 PM::<comment>Once Hillary gets the nomination - anti-Trump Republicans are going to wise up fast and get on board. Of course, the one-percenters and pundits will actually go for Hillary ( since she is Wall Street backed ) but they are few in number.</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:08 PM::<comment>Hillary will make Trump her VP ... they're such good pals and all</comment>

m w::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:10 PM::<comment>There will be Republican senators and congressmen running ads against Trump. There may be a conservative independent on the ballot.</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:11 PM::<comment>doubtful ..... there's no need</comment>

m w::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:13 PM::<comment>The ads are already being made. McConnell advised this and there is money to do it.</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:12 PM::<comment>Sorry, Spanky.  If Joe the Plumber wants to run against Trump - nobody will notice.</comment>

m w::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:14 PM::<comment>Sasse --he already said he would not support trump--or someone from the midwest where a state of two could be won by an independent in a three way race.The objective is to put the election into the House, not win at the polls.</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:16 PM::<comment>You wish. Sasse will not destroy his own career by bacstabbing his own party just to try to hurt Trump.</comment>

m w::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:18 PM::<comment>He already announced his opposition, yesterday.https://www.facebook.com/sasse.../561073597391141He said "A lot of us are out."http://www.realclearpolitics.c...</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:23 PM::<comment>LOL as if that is equivalent to RUNNING.</comment>

m w::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:26 PM::<comment>It is too soon to do that. But you will be right if there is nothing more after March 15th. He and Koch in the WaPo have set the stage, as in "ready, aim,..." It is plan B.I am not doing this, the Republican Party is doing it and I am pointing it out. People like the Kochs don't get to be rich by walking away. Also, they don't grovel.</comment>

EnderAK12::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:29 PM::<comment>Democratic Party had no problem unifying around Obama. They'll have no problem with Clinton.</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:31 PM::<comment>LOL. They had no problem KICKING HILLARY TO THE CURB in 2008, you meant to say.</comment>

EnderAK12::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:33 PM::<comment>If by kicking her to the curb you mean, "offered her Secretary of State, then paved her way to be the 2016 nominee," I would agree.</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:36 PM::<comment>That was Obama's choice, not the voters. Nice try, have a lollipop.</comment>

EnderAK12::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:36 PM::<comment>She's winning the Democratic primary far and away at the moment. By wider margins than Trump.</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:39 PM::<comment>She cannot win without getting almost all of Sanders' supporters.</comment>

EnderAK12::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:40 PM::<comment>Which she will. In addition to larger swaths of every minority group. Republicans have gone easy on Trump. Democrats have no incentive to.</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:45 PM::<comment>That's your personal hope - but nobody is interested in your personal hope.</comment>

EnderAK12::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:48 PM::<comment>All the Democrats to do is run a clip of Trump denying knowing who David Duke is to turn out blacks.All they have to do to turn out hispanics is a clip of Trump calling Mexicans rapists and killers.All they have to do to turn out moderates is point out Trump's hate for the Constitution.It's an easy argument. They're all things Trump can't run away from.</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:56 PM::<comment>Oh, yes - it's just THAT easy. That's why Peter Beinart is begging for liberals to vote for Rubio.</comment>

EnderAK12::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:58 PM::<comment>He's doing that, because unlike you (apparently), he doesn't want to see the Republican party destroy itself in the coming months.Trump is a trainwreck waiting to happen. If by some miracle he gets elected, he'll fail miserably at all his goals.</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:26 PM::<comment>Oh yes - Beinart is worried about the health of the Republican party.You are a regular Gatling Gun of b*llsh*t.</comment>

EnderAK12::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:28 PM::<comment>What an ironclad argument you have.</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:00 PM::<comment>The democrats will be voting for the liberal establishment candidate Trump.American patriots will be voting for Cruz or Rubio.</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:05 PM::<comment>After tomorrow, we no longer have to hear about the Ricky Ricardo twins.</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:06 PM::<comment>will we still hear about the orange robot?</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:05 PM::<comment>If you don't know who David Duke is you're not qualified to be president.</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:08 PM::<comment>If you love Duke so much, write him in.</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:09 PM::<comment>That appears to be who the Trump supporter want as VP</comment>

Scottie M::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:09 PM::<comment>I'm so excited for Donald Trump to make America Great Again! Trump 2016</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:11 PM::<comment>Too bad he's never specified how</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:10 PM::<comment>Trump has failed so many times .... he will certainly fail America</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:17 PM::<comment>I hope his supporters don't get any sweatier when Trump is convicted of fraud.Fraud .... just like his candidacy.</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:19 PM::<comment>Trump's hands are too small to be president</comment>

Pierce Moffett::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:20 PM::<comment>My prediction for Trump's VP pick: Nevada congresswoman Michele Fiore, who created a calendar of herself posing with guns You read it here first.http://www.guns.com/2015/11/06...</comment>

Fibonacci::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:40 PM::<comment>He won't pick a lesbian as his VP pick</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:41 PM::<comment>No thanks. </comment>

sweetjazz3::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:21 PM::<comment>To answer the headline:  people are going to vote for Clinton and Trump.  We know this already.Time to break out the bumper stickers from the 1991 Louisiana gubernatorial race:"Vote for the crook: It's important" and"Vote for the lizard, not the wizard"In fairness to Donald Drumpf, he is less KKK Grand Wizard and more Wizard of Oz.</comment>

EnderAK12::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:24 PM::<comment>I for one applaud our political parties for allowing our discourse to brought down to the level of early 90's Louisiana. Who doesn't want to take off their mask and live in Carcosa?</comment>

Cody Custis::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:48 PM::<comment>I thought that the Cowardly Lion was William Jennings Bryant.</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:22 PM::<comment>I have never seen such terror and panic in the "Stop Trump" camp.On the right - National Review has denounced Senator Jeff Sessions as a "prostitute" for stumping for Trump.On the left - Beinart in the Atlantic is begging for liberals to vote for Rubio in the primary.</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:24 PM::<comment>Jeff Sessions is a big establishment Republican .... Trump is the establishment candidate</comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:25 PM::<comment>B*llsh*t.</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:26 PM::<comment>Jeff Sessions - Establishment</comment>

EnderAK12::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:30 PM::<comment>Been in office since 1997. Voted party-line ever since.</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:32 PM::<comment>Cruz is establishment </comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:33 PM::<comment>not possible ... he hasn't been in the Senate long enough.</comment>

EnderAK12::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:34 PM::<comment>Washington hates him.</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:36 PM::<comment>Because he's autistic.</comment>

EnderAK12::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:37 PM::<comment>Takes one to know one, am I right?</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:37 PM::<comment>No personality. No style. Cruz is autism the candidate.</comment>

EnderAK12::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:38 PM::<comment>You guys seem basically to be clones of each other, I must say.</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:39 PM::<comment>Yes. I got your bad joke the first time around. Please tell me you're A Cruzbot </comment>

limoman::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:28 PM::<comment>PB was sniffing glue when he wrote that</comment>

SpawnofGhosts::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:30 PM::<comment>Eh no one listens to Beinart anyway.</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:42 PM::<comment>Dude they're terrified. They created this and now they're scared to death </comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:27 PM::<comment>America needs a conservative like Cruz .... not a liberal like Trump and Obama</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:32 PM::<comment>America needs an American. So not Cruz </comment>

Jack dog::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:37 PM::<comment>Trumps  wife should be deported! lol</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:38 PM::<comment>Do you think that will keep Heidi Cruz from killing herself? </comment>

tautological ennui::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:47 PM::<comment>Trump's policy of only hot single female immigrants will be historically awesome!</comment>

Fibonacci::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:49 PM::<comment>Drumpf is America's foremost anchor hubby.</comment>

John832::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:32 PM::<comment>Oligarchs and establishment hacks if history is any indication.</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:33 PM::<comment>Liberals love the tax scam on the poor and middle class known as Obamacare.Trump is a big supporter of Obamacare.</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:37 PM::<comment>I'd say Cruz is a bigger supporter of Obamacare</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:38 PM::<comment>of course you would .... most Trump supporters aren't informed</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:40 PM::<comment>Yea? Cruz supported John Roberts and begged for quick confirmation. I'd say Cruz is a bigger supporter of obamacare </comment>

tautological ennui::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:45 PM::<comment>Why does he always say he'll get rid of it? donaldjtrump.com</comment>

Fibonacci::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:47 PM::<comment>He will replace it with Obamacare and idiots like you will believe it's something new.</comment>

tautological ennui::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 10:17 PM::<comment>Ad hominem, eh</comment>

Dajjal::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:38 PM::<comment>Trump got endorsements from the 2 biggest bully governors in the country - Christie and LePage, also the biggest drug warriors.  LePage is an avowed racist ("Guys with names like Smoothy G coming up here to sell heroin to your young daughters") and he also said they should bring back the guillotine for drug dealers.  They are nasty, nasty people.  Trump says he knows killers and he's right.  Drug war's over, let's not bring it back.</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:39 PM::<comment>It's racist to say some people with names like smoothy g sell drugs? Good to know. Can you make a list for me of all of the things we are supposed to be offended by? </comment>

Dajjal::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:39 PM::<comment>Yes, they are horrible people.  Plus he has small hands.</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:40 PM::<comment>Sure. Just make me a list so I have an idea of when to be offended </comment>

Fibonacci::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:57 PM::<comment>Trump has the thinnest skin of all candidates. He is a lightweight.</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:40 PM::<comment>I'll bet Trump's filthy corrupt union buddies can't wait to get started on that wall which will never be completed and end up costing the poor and middle class billions in taxes.</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:41 PM::<comment>Saves the country money actually. </comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:42 PM::<comment>billions in taxes saves the country money .... that's something I'd expect Nancy Pelosi to say .... well ... after all .. she is good pals with Trump</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:42 PM::<comment>I'm sorry, do you not realize that we aren't paying for the wall? Silly goose </comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:43 PM::<comment>The liar says we're not paying for the wall ... but the informed know better</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:44 PM::<comment>You're voting for Cruz. Safe to say you're not informed </comment>

limoman::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:55 PM::<comment>Safe to say a few other things about him too ;)</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:07 PM::<comment>Dude, you're an Illinois conservative, you wouldn't vote for Cruz, right?</comment>

limoman::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:14 PM::<comment>NO EFFING WAY</comment>

tautological ennui::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:44 PM::<comment>We give Mexico $500 million/year. That's enough to get it built.</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:45 PM::<comment>by giving money to Mexico? .... care to explain how giving money to Mexico gets a wall built?</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:45 PM::<comment>I know you're a Cruzbot so you need help, but try not to be this slow. </comment>

tautological ennui::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:48 PM::<comment>The money will be spent on the wall instead.</comment>

TomLuTon::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:08 PM::<comment>You do know that's the USA paying for the wall then. It's like using your kid's allowance to pay for the broken window instead of telling him to go get a job and pay for it.</comment>

tautological ennui::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 10:16 PM::<comment>Nuance it as you will. The argument for Mexican aid is to inhibit immigration. No change, really, just a more effective measure.</comment>

tautological ennui::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 11:44 PM::<comment>Or to stop spending money on everyone else's kids and start spending it on your own.</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:43 PM::<comment>We will build a wall and Mexico is paying for it. Hell yea. Trump 2016. </comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:46 PM::<comment>in other words ... the wall will never be built ....... sucker</comment>

Fibonacci::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:46 PM::<comment>You are a phucking idiot to believe that.</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:46 PM::<comment>Not at all. It's the most realistic proposal in the entire race </comment>

Fibonacci::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:47 PM::<comment>No it isn't </comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:47 PM::<comment>Good argument. Well thought out. </comment>

Fibonacci::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:49 PM::<comment>About as well thought out as you explanation.</comment>

Dajjal::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:44 PM::<comment>What's this wall fetish?  People get excited by the Great Wall of Trump because they believe it can actually stop illegal immigration and drugs.  But here's the problem - we hired them.  And paid them.  For years.  We are addicted to cheap labor and figure out another way to bring them over.  As for drugs, the desire for them is insatiable.  The solution is more heroin, not less.  Portugal's decriminalization actually reduced drug use and mortality.  The point is, you can't protect people from themselves and their own desires.  Of course, Trump promises to do exactly that.  But it will only ramp up war and strife.  We don't need more of that.  Bloomberg 2016!</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:45 PM::<comment>Good thing most states are "At will" and people can be fired then. </comment>

Dajjal::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:47 PM::<comment>OK but they weren't fired.  Obviously people want illegals working for them.  How will a wall stop this?  Most people arrive by legal means, not walking across the border.</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:48 PM::<comment>But they weren't fired doesn't invalidate the fact that they can be. </comment>

spudwhisperer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:47 PM::<comment>You don't understand economics.  "We" are not addicted to cheap labor.The one-percenters are. "We" are not "Them".Capiche, kimosabe?</comment>

Dajjal::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:48 PM::<comment>Claiming that someone "doesn't understand" and following that with "capiche" is bullying.  Thanks for the demonstration, please proceed to show how Trump plans to enforce compliance among the dissenters:</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:45 PM::<comment>Remember when Trump supported Schumer on the "Gang of Eight" legislation?Trump is a huge pro-amnesty supporter.</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:46 PM::<comment>Link? This is actually a new one. </comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:47 PM::<comment>Trump has admitted it himself .... just how uninformed are you Trump supporters?</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:47 PM::<comment>Link? </comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:48 PM::<comment>look it up yourself you lazy Trump supporter</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:48 PM::<comment>So nothing. Got it. Moving on </comment>

#LeftIsNeverRight::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:48 PM::<comment>Hey, Guyzer.Just a hypothetical question for you because I believe we both detest Bill's wife equally....If trump wins the gop nomination, would you vote for him over Killary?</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:49 PM::<comment>I would have to hold my nose and hope for the best</comment>

#LeftIsNeverRight::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:01 PM::<comment>Same here.  Trump would get my vote because he is not Killary.</comment>

#LeftIsNeverRight::Wednesday, March 2, 2016 3:18 AM::<comment>Trump not is!I did not expect this to be the reality, but here we are.</comment>

#LeftIsNeverRight::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:47 PM::<comment>Smart black voters support Bernie.The dumb ones vote for Bill's crotch.</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:47 PM::<comment>Looking forward to this wall being built that Mexico is paying for. Finally an adult will be in charge. Trump 2016</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:48 PM::<comment>Mexico says they're not going to pay for it ...... oh well</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:49 PM::<comment>They don't have a choice. Lol. </comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:51 PM::<comment>Is Trump the president of Mexico?</comment>

Fibonacci::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:51 PM::<comment>You are a LIAR. No wall will be built. </comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:06 PM::<comment>Yea? Why not?</comment>

DougDoug::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:12 PM::<comment>Hillary is more of a man than you'll ever be.</comment>

DonaldJohnTrump::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 10:44 PM::<comment>Hillary is a joke.  But not a good one. More of a sad one.</comment>

Jiffy Pop::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:48 PM::<comment>Trump vs Hillary.</comment>

Jiffy Pop::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:50 PM::<comment>I hope Trump gets elected and once per day he changes one law by executive order, and decided not to enforce another law.   In another worlds, I hope he acts like Obama. on steroids.</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:51 PM::<comment>Why not end all of Obama's illegal executive orders on the very first day like Cruz will do?</comment>

TomLuTon::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:53 PM::<comment>Maybe you can explain something to meHow come Trump forcing businesses to hire American workers that they don't want and forcing businesses to build factories where they don't want is NOT 'government interfering in business', but Obama forcing companies not to pollute the air or water is?</comment>

Fibonacci::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:55 PM::<comment>Because to Trumpster divers, clean air and water are bad. </comment>

Jiffy Pop::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:06 PM::<comment>I'd explain it, but you wouldn't get it.</comment>

TomLuTon::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:06 PM::<comment>Try me</comment>

MumbleMumble::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:40 PM::<comment>I'm on pins and needles to hear this brilliant explanation.</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:53 PM::<comment>Trump supporters musta got der learnin at Trump University</comment>

Dajjal::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:53 PM::<comment>Trump is a bully and his followers are nasty bullies.  They will use all the standard Nazi tactics to enforce compliance among their critics.  They have all sorts of libel and 'cyber bullying' laws planned and of course their thugs will run around telling people "You don't understand basic economics", "You are ignorant" etc.  Of course, they will also brandish their guns, which Trump supports ("I could shoot someone walking down 5th Ave") as long as you are on his side.  If not you will be declared 'mentally ill' because according to Trump 'There are always red flags and early warning signs'.  A tactic which of course he borrows from the Soviets and was used for the Gulag.  He and his followers are very dangerous and represent a grave threat to this country.</comment>

TotoCatcher::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:57 PM::<comment>I think you are talking about the Democrats and what Obama has actually been doing already. </comment>

Fibonacci::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:53 PM::<comment>Oranjeclown will get smoked in then general election. Hillary will make him cry during the debates.</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:54 PM::<comment>Trump isn't doing any more debates .... he says they're stupid</comment>

Fibonacci::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:56 PM::<comment>And that won't help him at all. I hope he sits out.</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:56 PM::<comment>me too ... it will be like Iowa all over again</comment>

Fibonacci::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:59 PM::<comment>Only much more consequential. Conservatives are trying to goad Drumpf into skipping the 3/10 debate. I hope he takes the bait.</comment>

TotoCatcher::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:55 PM::<comment>Notice how the editors have no thought for what it means to have a nation becoming increasingly divided by "race" groups or ethnic groups. They appear to believe its somehow a positive thing. I'm pretty sure its not. If you look around the world the pattern is fairly consistent that homogeous nations have fewer problems in a given situation. And more divided nations are far more prone to genocides, attrocities, and deep corruption. All of sub-saharan Africa is composed of nations with deep tribal divisions and these are nations with plenty of resources and plenty of corruption.Yet, notice how nobody wants to talk about this. </comment>

Dajjal::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:58 PM::<comment>How's that manifesto coming?  You are so brave to talk about these important issues, maybe say something about Darwin and 'survival of the fittest' and "Nature's Laws":</comment>

DougDoug::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:58 PM::<comment>That's because it's so freaking ludicrous you'd need a tinfoil thong to believe it would actually happen.</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:59 PM::<comment>Yep ... Obama has attempted to turn the US into Africa</comment>

Arcite::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:59 PM::<comment>Meh, the US economy is doing fine, the stock market is great, gas is cheap. Trump is nothing more than a populist savior for the economically and socially marginalized.</comment>

TomLuTon::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:00 PM::<comment>"And more divided nations are far more prone to genocides, atrocities, and deep corruption.""Canada meets target to resettle 25,000 Syrian refugeesPrime minister Justin Trudeau made the pledge as he came to power – now Canada could take up to 50,000 people fleeing violence by the end of 2016"http://www.theguardian.com/wor...</comment>

Arcite::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:02 PM::<comment>Globalization is a fact of life. It's sad a vocal minority are trying to fight it with fear, bigotry, intolerance, and calls to violence. Meanwhile, most are benefiting.</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:56 PM::<comment>Trump supported the establishment's bank bail outs ... Trump is the establishment candidate.</comment>

Dajjal::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:56 PM::<comment>Trump might win some states in the South.  They are still resentful for losing the Civil War, and would love to start up another race war.  However, he will fail big time in the north.  They haven't forgotten the sacrifice they made for freedom and human rights.  There is no need to go back to the witch hunts of persecuting vulnerable minorities, whether it be blacks, muslims or illegals.</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:57 PM::<comment>The New York liberals still love Trump</comment>

Dajjal::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:58 PM::<comment>NY is winner take all, so it doesn't really matter.</comment>

DougDoug::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:57 PM::<comment>I wonder if DJT, Cruz and Rubio will all be friends once DJT seals up the nomination. I mean, they'll need all the firepower they can get to beat a real political gangster. They're all really amateur hour compared to HRC.</comment>

limoman::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:58 PM::<comment>Cruz has consistently said he likes Don</comment>

DougDoug::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:59 PM::<comment>And we've already seen what previous loudmouths will do to curry favor.</comment>

gman::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 8:58 PM::<comment>Trump and his racist hillbillies don't have a chance.  I hope this doesn't mean we are left with that stooge Killary.  Either way things are shaping up to be a bumpy ride.</comment>

Dajjal::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:01 PM::<comment>Cruz is the Manitobian Candidate.  His plan is to stage a muslim terrorist attack and use that as a pretext to restrict all civil liberties.  He will continue with his campaign regardless of how badly he does because he wants to destroy the country.  This is the longtime goal of Canadia.  They want to establish a Christian Caliphate named "Gilead".  This is all explained in the Canadian bible - The Handmaid's Tale by Margaret Atwood.  Bloomberg 2016!</comment>

TomLuTon::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:02 PM::<comment>Albertan. If you're going to create conspiracies, get them right.Or are you one of THEM?</comment>

Dajjal::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:05 PM::<comment>Maybe.  How can I tell?</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:02 PM::<comment>Lots of democrats are supporting the liberal Trump .... which means that when they go to the ballot box they won't be voting for conservatives or Republicans in your local and state races.Trump is doing everything he can to hand our local, state and federal govt. to the establishment democrats.</comment>

Fibonacci::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:03 PM::<comment>He sure is, senate and quite possibly the house will turn. </comment>

BillAlphonso::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:04 PM::<comment>Trump is going to win so much that he's going to get sick of winning.</comment>

Fibonacci::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:04 PM::<comment>Not</comment>

Dajjal::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:04 PM::<comment>Trump followers are bullies and just want to fight.  They aren't 'afraid' of illegal immigrants and in fact they benefit daily from their cheap labor - cooking, cleaning, construction.  But now suddenly it's a huge existential threat to America and they all gotta go.  Why?  Because they get excited by rounding them up and they even have 'gun collections' which they curated especially for this purpose.  And of course, muslims if that doesn't work out.  And of course, blacks if that doesn't work out.</comment>

Fibonacci::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:05 PM::<comment>Like Gov. Porky said, just ask Trump how?</comment>

Guyzer::Tuesday, March 1, 2016 9:06 PM::<comment>yep ... since that drip couldn't answer the question himself</comment>

